How often do you meet an enterprising 24-year-old who's adorable, gracious and a talented ice cream maker?
"Well, that is all for this month but I will make sure Candy has lots of pictures of my cute kids for next month! I will also make sure she shows them to you when they are born so you don't have to wait and wait...like me..."
So that's what was going on in New York last night.
I think the jelly turned out beautiful! It is not perfectly clear like some jelly, since when I drained the peels some particulates were left and I didn't want to strain them out. Too much peachy goodness to waste!
4) Why (and How) Abortion Should Be Talked about in Church Churches that speak of abortion without acknowledging that many women have experienced it as an injustice, not as a choice, drive women deeper into their pain rather than set them free from the captivity where they are both bound and gagged.
When did she get so wise?
Giving up drink may not help you live to 100, but it will certainly feel like it
Report of the joint inquiry motivated IRON MAN's formal complaint, that JFIC withheld intelligence from congress
Farmer #1: Well, I’m sure glad to share our crop plans with you all. Looking forward to trying out some of those new varieties of heirloom vegetables you all suggested and my friend here (indicating Farmer #2) for sharing seeds with me.
They were seriously delicious. There is something about pork tenderloin that I love so much! I never even used pork tenderloin in my meals before I started cooking with my husband – but you can buy them pre-seasoned or plain and add your own. So easy! And it’s a pretty lean cut of meat, so you don’t add all the excess fat/calories.
For those who send the pack back to Pixmania this does not give a guarantee they will recognise that it got back to them. Because some complaints show that when people asked their credit card company to get their money back the Credit Card company let them know they can not reimburse the money because Pixmania told them they did not receive the goods back.
It included questions such as how many cigarettes people smoke, and whether they like a smoky atmosphere in pubs.
In the plane of consciousness point (x) represents points (y), (z)….n
We could obviously spend all day talking about this and still not cover every potential scenario. So think about the places where you spend the most time and make a specific plan for each location. The more prepared you are, and the more you consider specific circumstances, the better prepared
The figures speak for themselves:
The dinner came at the end of a day of bilateral meetings and many earlier references to the Special Relationship, beginning with the morning Arrival Ceremony on the South Lawn, all paying tribute to what the White House hails as "a rock-solid alliance" between the US and the United Kingdom. Hundreds of guests filled the South Lawn for the ceremony, including US and American school children.
-shoulder block by Sheamus, crowd shits on it.
Crossrail is going to be shit anyway, because it doesn't serve the Westfield.
forever fresh, yearning
Direct call is a feature which allows you to call a contact from reading or composing a text message, if you are doing either and place the phone against your ear the phone will automatically call the contact on the screen for you!
Here is a quick post of some pictures of Kyce. I was babysitting and he was just so darn cute! He is just starting to crawl, sorta of:)) He actually scoots or drags himself, either way he is growing so fast. He also loves to eat as his big old fatty belly, and those ham hocks of thighs show! He has 3 teeth now, and is on solids for breakfast, lunch and dinner. His adopted Nanny Susan wanted to see him, and since I adore Susan it is easy to do as she asks.
"He was found passed out in his apartment," I told her. "Apparently he'd been out for a while. Does it say what caused him to lose consciousness in the first place?"
I give everything to you
A man’s heart plans his way, but the LORD directs his steps. ~ Proverbs 16:9
- Minutes of several site meetings held between SGL, contractors, labourers and the project steering committee show that some of the labourers were not paid for up to four months.
i actually planned to do "pin the banana on the monkey" with a huge pic
A personal testimony does not save a sinner. The Gospel does. It’s quite right to support a Gospel presentation with what the Gospel has done in one’s life. Yet, we must never confuse the Gospel itself with a personal testimony.
Wow, I had friends I didn’t even know existed. I looked at Princess, who was staring at of the window worriedly.
But then, they never have.
Needless to say we’re not working on our days off and the whole idea very quickly disappeared.
My SIL's wedding is tomorrow! EEK!! I am excited and soooo stressed. I have to be up by 7:30am and be at our hair appt at 9am and then it's a long drive to the venue (about an hour) and then time to rehearse and then get all prettied up. I will get as many pics as possible to share. Can't wait.
Some other interesting questions.
Makeup: Mark Coulier & J. Roy Helland, The Iron Lady
As I cast my mind back through former relationships I cannot help but wonder if there had been times where I had actually met the one but that I was too jaded to notice. I certainly thought a couple of times that I had met one at the time until I got to know them more; but how do we ever really know?
The Choice ( 2007)
The Pepper Pots play Saturday, March 21 @ 11:00 p.m. at Opal Divine's Freehouse (700 W 6th St ).
To those who have left comments, you stand above others and I think I can speak for my peers and say a very BIG THANK-YOU for taking the time.
The website closed down in 2001, another victim of the internet crash, but it wouldn't have survived the music revolution anyway. There is little place for an all-encompassing media today in the MySpace and Itunes world where musicians can promote and distribute their own creations. Record companies are unregretted victims, but further down the chain, many others have suffered too. This was what brought about the death of Jussieu Music and several other CD retailers across Paris.
One of my 18 year old twin boys saved up all his spare money for six months in order to be able to buy tickets for Download Festival. I was shocked to hear the ticket cost £200 and that excludes his transport and refreshments.
All these things came together to form a cohesive, bright, beautiful thing in The Son's Room, a film which left us in a sheen of brilliance for years and years. Yes, it was that good. It makes you love humanity, for the love of… humanity. And it makes grief something dignified and heroic, something tragic and pure. It made us cry so, so much.
She is my precious sweet angel baby girl , but I was counting the minutes until her bedtime tonight.
Perhaps what we’re seeing with Krugman is merely a high-profile manifestation of a widespread phenomenon in recent years, and perhaps much of our national recent history. Krugman has had his faith shaken, and he’s reacting by lashing out at familiar enemies. He looks out his window and sees the world is not as it should be, and he concludes it must be the fault of those who he has opposed and denounced all along.
Chinamora, “You and your family don’t go but stay here at the Mission.” Chinamora and his family were kept at the Mission farm by the missionaries.
Status: On hold at the library, #1 in queue
Barcelona and Real Madrid were the major contenders for the title this year too, which was no surprise. But, this season Real Madrid looked a far more balanced side with Jose Mourinho at the helm of things. He brought the best out of the team, which the managers had failed to in the recent past.
I am having my first event this Friday at work. I am in charge of the catering portion. I feel like I have everything under control, which means, I forgotten something. Hopefully it will show itself tomorrow so it will go off without a hitch on Friday.
Good Morning! Today I'm posting my card for the Twisted Tuesday Challenge blog. This is our first challenge so I hope you will join us! This week's challenge was a great one! We were to create a card with clouds on it, but the twist was that they couldn't be stamped.
Ms. Cullen's Primary class from Yarmouth, Nova Scotia has done a wonderful job of making sight words out of the printable Alphabet Pattern Blocks! I think their good work and great smiles are worthy of a special category award all their own! Thanks so much for sharing your work!
Please check the customer reviews and ratings of PocketWizard Plus II Transceiver Relay Radio Slave Transmitter and Receiver 4-Pack w/ 2 PockeWizard Cases (2 PocketWizards Per Case) on the merchant’s site by visit the link below.
The actual hearing is scheduled from 2PM-5PM and 6PM-8PM. DDDB asks the public to sign in and testify against the project. If you are unable to come for the afternoon protest and hearing, DDDB urges you to come for the late afternoon/evening hearing.
The couple, who love to spend weekends at home, envisioned their dream house as a spacious single-story with a table for dinning, a room for stretching out and a terrace as specific requests. Due to site conditions the final design grew to a double story residence; however, the open view of the second floor was designed to retain a single-story atmosphere for the family to spend most of the day relaxed. The terrace, the most time-consuming element of the design process, is oriented to the south for sunlight and located directly over the entrance, connected to the living area as one united space, and covered with louvers to protect privacy.
Wall Street - but what’s bad about that?
they are all safely back aboard the ship,
Be aware, too, that he likely will fall in the initial period. It's very hard to break an addiction, and he'll be moody, twitchy, and angry. He can't be perfect overnight. And occasionally he's going to fall, whether it's at work where he still has internet access or when he's in a hotel or something. If he does fall, he's going to feel even worse.
- it takes just one panicked yelp when you aren’t feeling well to make me bolt out of bed to take you outside (in the pouring rain) at three a.m.;
This is not to say “we” aren’t out there. I recently did an adoption for a foster of mine with a deformed leg. She (by all accounts and purposes – though I have no genetic proof or any proof for that matter) is a Nebelung. Looks just like one, acts just like one – with a completely backwards front leg.
Elsewhere the same John writes, “If we confess our sins he is faithful and just to forgive us our sins and to cleanse us from all unrighteousness.” He writes this to believers.
The Bride and Groom
“Does Cognitive Science Show Belief in God to be Irrational? The Epistemic Consequences of the Cognitive Science of Religion” (2011) International Journal of the Philosophy of ReligionThis is part of a broader series of posts on evolutionary debunking arguments (EDAs). These arguments claim that if a belief-forming faculty is the product of a process that does not track the truth with respect to the relevant class of propositions, then any beliefs produced by that faculty are unjustified.
I approve of women being able to have the option of raising their kids at home, regardless of their income level. Even those on public welfare should be afforded the opportunity (if they have a working partner) to raise the kids, rather than being forced to choose between maintaining their benefits or raising their kids. I firmly believe that a big social problem is that there are not enough available role models available for the youth of America because of the requirement to work if you want benefits.
“I suppose I could have stayed home and baked cookies and had teas, but what I decided to do was to fulfill my profession which I entered before my husband was in public life.”
दरवाजे के पास कुर्सी पर बैठी हुई लड़की – “The girl sitting on the chair near the door”
Seriously though, when you go overly apeshit with the Pledge (or Pam for that matter) and get some on the floor by mistake, it takes years for the floor not to be slippery anymore. It's a death trap for anyone wearing socks. Suddenly you have small zones of floor all around your house, marked off with cones, that you know to be careful around, like hardwood black ice.
Card is 5 1/2 by 4 1/4
5) Add to smoothies ... zucchini "stretches" smoothies so you don't need to add as many sugar-filled fruits
Welcome to Week 9 of Paint Party Friday (Year 2) and to the next edition of our Featured Artist Series! (Would you like to be a PPF Featured Artist? Please click here for details!) Our featured artist this week has been dazzling us with her amazing acrylics since Week 1! Please welcome Stephanie Corder of Dragonfly Design Studios.
Cools HJ, van Essen GA; Dutch Society of Nursing Home Specialists. Practice guideline 'Influenza prevention in nursing homes and care homes', issued by the Dutch Society of Nursing Home Specialists; division of tasks between nursing home specialist, general practitioner and company doctor. Ned Tijdschr Geneeskd 2005; 149: 119-124; discussion 116-118.
There is a small part of me that wonders if this is simply to do with my mental health problems. I have BPD, depression, and anxiety. My psychologist thinks it’s dissociation and depersonalisation, a psychiatrist in hospital said it was psychosis, but my own psychiatrist said I am not psychotic but offered no explanation. I took an online test for early schizophrenia symptoms and it concluded that I had a significant degree of the symptoms. I’m not saying that I am schizophrenic or psychotic, perhaps the fact I am questioning things rules that out. I think it’s more likely that no one knows how to stop me from finding out the truth.
….the guy you broke up with a week ago shows up at your work to tell you everything you needed to hear- a week ago. That he does care about you, more than you could even imagine, that he’s been so incredibly sad the past week, that he not only can, but does see a future with you. A future that includes marriage and babies and forever.
It felt good to be back riding her.
Now that I'm back, I figured I might as well finish it, even if the immediacy of responding to Scott Pilgrim right after its release is inevitably gone. Because, believe it or not, these two very different films have at least one common thread worth elaborating on.
To prepare for the class, I’ve read three books written for perspective college students. All three were helpful and I would recommend any of the three to new college students. However, I have “ranked” them in order of my preferences. Here are some brief summaries and comments of each.
This cookie was inspired by some homemade peppermint pattie recipes that I have been wanting to try, but I wanted to make my pattie with a cookie and a little crunch. So I guess they could be considered a close cousin to the scout's thin mints, but because I never was a scout or ever really ate any scout cookies, I decided to call this cookie what it is to me, a peppermint....pattie....cookie.
-- School Library Journal
The 3rd night we used our mad skills to make tamales. A first time for all of us & a really fun group project. They were DELICIOUS and we'll be making more again very soon.
I have to admit that the propaganda seems to have worked on me, Thatcher fought her last election before I could vote for or against her, but ever since I could vote, the idea of voting Tory seems an anathema, and I actually moved straight from voting New Labour in the last three elections, to voting BNP last month, without even considering a flirtation with Mr Cameron.
It made me think about all the questions I should have asked my Mum and Dad by now. About the stuff we tell our children, and the stuff we don't.
I cut out a few more pieces of fabric using my new table and it wasn't too shabby. It's a little manly looking but was everything the package said it would be. Except, of course, for the fact that it will never see a campground. Welcome to my world.
Ozzy Osbourne No more tears UK
“You know, a double donger… it’s got a dickhead on both sides, so two people can enjoy it. Or one person if you bend it in a C shape…”
I also wanna give a shout out to a couple of bloggers who are just the bee's knees, the Cat's meow, the butter to a loaf of yummy Avanti's bread....bloggers who honestly I have no idea how long they have been around but they rock, seriously they rock the dance floor or the stripper pole or the metal cage. They are a couple of people new to my blog role but people I do a little dance of joy when I see they have written anything new. One of the people I stalk is Rooked who is just plain and simple an amazing writer, I actually read his posts from begining to the end and that's saying alot for me, since I usually read his stuff early in the morning when the caffeine is just kickin in and I start to shake a bit from the overload to my system. He can turn a post about homeless crazy people and tornadoes into a work of art. I am a fan. My other favorite blog of the moment is Angela over at My Bella Figlia . She takes awesome pictures of her (almost as cute as mine) kids. Her posts are heartfelt, funny and just plain good. So go over there and read her now!
There should be a crisis here and, for me, there certainly is a crisis to be seen in Havekost’s work. Perhaps more than the two painters he is continuously compared to, Luc Tuymans and Richter, Havekost has journeyed to the edge of a culture where the explosion of imagery in of all different formats and media has led only to the destruction of the image’s power to carry a message, to issue a sting of reality to the viewer, to call forth a specter of lived experience.
www.rpoatexasoutreach.org
It ignores the political realities in Zimbabwe, reduces the chance of success for the new government and could lead to the total collapse of the deal if the Movement for Democratic Change decides to reject the package.
self as a woman. My toenails are always painted, I've found a local
Prior to this, the notion of platform building confused and concerned me to the point of taking up much more of my available ‘thinking space’ than the writing of my novel. A comment was made on the blog post that if Tolkien had lived in todays world and been pre-occupied with social media we might never have been given The Lord of the Rings. While I don’t for one second believe I’m in the same galaxy as Mr Tolkien, I believe the point is relevant to all of us. In a fast-paced world where most of us within the ‘aspiring author’ category have to squeeze writing our novels into what little spare time we have in our day, shouldn’t we be focusing almost exclusively on improving the quality of our work than the quality of our social media platform?
And so the presidential collapse continues unabated. I take no delight in this fact, recognizing it only as the least worst of possibilities, but this administration has become an affront to our liberty rather than a guarantor of it. As such, this president’s problems are of his own making, and history will not judge him kindly.
It's a bit of an extreme example, too; the other scenes I looked at (one from 'The Ships of Merior' by Janny Wurts, one from 'Lord of Chaos' by Robert Jordan, and one from 'The Name of the Wind' by Patrick Rothfuss) were more balanced, but all of them, consistently, went against the piece of advice I'd been most suspicious of - mixing environment description in with the dialogue.
natural death as soon as the
I carved your name into my left thigh.
These are among the findings of a report released by the American Society of Civil Engineers, which assigned an overall D grade to the nation’s infrastructure and estimated that it would take a $2.2 trillion investment from all levels of government over the next five years to bring it into a state of good repair.
I snapped this fun Lichtenstein over Michael's shoulder and later heard a guard tell
There are a lot of folks serving up advice on how to deal with workplace bullying these days. Some appear to know what they’re talking about, and others cause me to think, uh oh, this doesn’t sound right.
the gorgeous Spellbinders die cut is called floral ovals, I added a hint of Distress ink to the edge,
Thom Terrazas,
Your local is in danger. We need to save our pubs. Have a think about what you can do with the space on offer – start a darts team, a chess club, book bands to play… anything to bring back that warming sense of community to your local boozer.
5. It's a Sin to Tell a Lie
Maybe he's a geek too, someone who swallows a LOT and blushes whenever she looks at him. Someone her grandpa knows but she's never really looked at before. Does he know something about all this? Perhaps the heroine grabs him and won't let go until he spills the beans, and in the process she finds that he's really cool. Or maybe he's not a he - maybe it's a girl. The perky cheerleader of North Indian descent who the heroine has a secret crush on.
“Sorry, son. What’ya say?”
After writing this, and letting it sit a couple days, I stumbled upon Terry Towry's post regarding his renewed interest in his current WIP, and I thought his musings clearly reflected the message Elizabeth Gilbert was trying to impart. He says of his finished first novel: “while I'm fairly proud of how it turned out, there was not one moment during the actual writing period that I considered fun.” A sentiment I can totally get on board with for my own first novel.
If you have never been to a trotting event, this weekend is the perfect occasion. Trotting (harness racing) is a kind of horse-race in which the jockeys are not on the horses, but rather placed in a very uncomfortable looking chariot behind. The pace is slower than a standard horse-race as the speed can never get beyond a trot, with the horse and jockey being eliminated if they quicken the steps. The spectacle though is as much in the crowd as on the track for this event which is expected to attract 40,000 spectators including many celebrities. There is even a special limited edition Zadig et Voltaire t-shirt!
You may notice that I scrap a lot about myself, while I still have two children. One is that my husband is not very into publishing photos online from them.. a bit protective I guess, but ofcourse I accept his thoughts and feelings (although I will sneak one in once in a while LOL).. another factor is that I DO love to scrap about myself. Not only because I am important too, but to self reflect, to learn, to accept.
Here is what has happened so far:
Ministry of Health is responsible for funding the organisation but it has been reported that it has not yet released the funds to the organisation.
to use Charter Schools as way of driving down teacher’s wages. Most regular
Maybe the photos were good after all.
You can argue whether the above is good or bad demolition. This is the type of situation that calls for second thoughts - how to integrate the old and the new - and preserve our history.
6. You see a gorgeous girl at a party. You go up to her and say: 'I am very rich. Marry me!' She gives you a nice hard slap on your face.- That's Customer Feedback
“If you have any questions, or would like further details, please send an e-mail to enquiries@derwentpress.com. We will e-mail you our full contact details, including address and telephone number, so you can discuss any additional points or requirements you may have.”
4. “I give the president full credit for this, it took a lot of guts. … He’s the commander-in-chief, he was the guy who put it on the line. There was no guarantee — none — that this would work.” – Rep. Peter King (R-N.Y.), chairman of the Homeland Security Committee (May 2011)
Marcus Mebes’s Lurline and the White Ravens of Oz is one of the most detailed descriptions of the enchantment, but also leaves a lot of questions. As Marcus identifies it as a myth, it might not be true in all its details. Lurline is due to join the Olympian pantheon, but she steals items of power from the gods in order to enchant Oz, and is banished from Olympus. Exactly when this takes place is unclear, as there are references to both the fall of Troy and the three wise men following the star to Bethlehem, which happened over a millennium apart. It’s definitely ancient, though, and it identifies the ruler at the time as Ozroar of Morrow. He’s married to a woman named Ozia, daughter of Oziana. The first edition of this book made Ozroar and Ozia Pastoria‘s parents and Ozma’s grandparents, but the later edition keeps things vague on this point. I believe the king is also identified as Ozroar in Jeremy Steadman’s Emerald Ring, which states that he threw the titular ring out to sea when he was dying. Scott Dickerson’s Magic Book tells how a fairy from Lurline’s band named Ozymandias becomes the first ruler of Oz, and how he is turned into a wooden canary. Charles Phipps’s Umbrella Man trilogy has Oz enchanted during the reign of a king named Saul, whose father left Oz in a magical boat, and who had an older brother named David who actually married Lurline. He is a terrible king until the Water of Oblivion changes his mind. My way of fitting much of this together is to say that Oziana was the ruler of the central part of Oz, and that his daughter Ozia married Roarer of Morrow. When Oziana died, Roarer became king of the central land as well, and hence took the name Ozroar. David and Saul could then have been his children. We’re also told in Magic Tapestry that Ozroar had an illegitimate son, Evrard, who went on to be King of Ev. Ozymandias complicates matters a bit, but perhaps he was Oziana’s ancestor. Adding in Phil Lewin’s Witch Queen and Master Crafters is even more confusing, as it says that Lurline’s older sister Enilrul was the original Queen of Oz, and Nikidik her consort. There’s no reason all of these people couldn’t have ruled at some time or other, but it’s unlikely that the enchantment occurred in all of their reigns. Perhaps the records are unclear as to who the ruler was at the time of the enchantment, so historians just assigned it to the time of some old monarch or other.
This vlog is about...reality tv. Surprise. :) Oh, does the fact that I laugh about what I say make me crazy?
In the London Review of Books, Jacqueline Rose published this fascinating article about Marylin Monroe, not as a beautiful, sexy woman, but rather as a symbol of intelligence and feminism. I would rather not spend the time to relate the content of the article, which you can read for free here. Jacqueline Rose analyzises in fines detail why Marylin Monroe was, as Fitzgerald called her “a little ahead of her times” – her passion for books, her self-education on politics (she thought that politiciens were/are corrupt especially because people do not show interest in politics and are ignorant in learning about it), her militant attitude for black people’s rights and equal acceptance in society, her feminism in some of her less well-known plays and films.
53. Queen Lydia Liliuokalani was the last reigning monarch of the Hawaiian Islands. She was also the only Queen the United States ever had.
Add corn starch to 2-4 tablespoons of water to dissolve, and continue to slowly stir into sauce until it is thickened (this will take some time).
Kirsty Neary doesn’t quite hit the mark either. Her prose reading is juxtaposed with a film show; however, the prose – an oddly phrased fantasy with nameless characters and switching perspectives – doesn’t build enough bridges with the reader / listener to make them want to care about what’s going on, and the film, which has some undeniably arresting images, ends with the rather clichéd and patronising “Here Endeth the Lesson”. It’s a piece that sounds as if it has promise but needs a careful reworking. She’s a young lady with bags of confidence, though: there’s already a multi-media disc of the work available at the show.
He is famed for having been burned at the stake for heresy against the doctrines of the Catholic Church, including those on ecclesiology, the Eucharist, and other theological topics. Hus was a key predecessor to the Protestant movement of the sixteenth century, and his teachings had a strong influence on the states of Europe, most immediately in the approval for the existence of a reformist Bohemian religious denomination, and, more than a century later, on Martin Luther himself.
What they don’t realise though is that dozens more meteorites have fallen to the earth under the cloak of all the fireworks going off, and the aliens in these ones are far bigger, far more dangerous and are coming after them specifically.
Dr. Sandra Wells of the public health department of University of Nebraska Medical Center told local Rotarians that much of that meth—and what is still made in homemade labs — affects not only the user but those who live in the household.
There are flowers blooming… in our yard… in FEBRUARY!
“The right to assemble was granted and I was convinced then, as I am now, that if Merdeka Stadium was accepted as the venue for the sit-down rally, the ugly scenes we witnessed on April 28, 2012, would not have occurred and our country would have been spared of yet another trauma after Bersih 2.0 in July last year.”
to pay for contraception
“I wouldn’t have known the difference,” she countered.
D.H: Brady sacked, 4th down, defense!
Australia punches Turkey, and gets punched back. There are no hard feelings, because Britain made Australia do it.
While visiting Kearney, be sure to include time to visit the Great Platte River Road Archway Museum - which just happens to be located ACROSS Interstate 80.
Thank you for visiting my blog and for all your emails and comments which I love reading. I'll be back tomorrow with more crafting fun and I hope to see you then.
A step or two we walked along,
I think you can see the true chocolate color a little better in this close-up!?
A lovelorn rhapsody
Not quite as polished as the first and last 077 adventures, ORIENT is, nonetheless, an enjoyable international romp with a slew of sexy women (I'm a big fan of the curvaceous Ms. Lee), plenty of rough and tumble two-fisted action for the athletic Clark, and professional direction by Sergio Grieco. Agent 077 is equipped with a few nifty gadgets, and his globetrotting provides the viewer with some nice travelogue footage. Although the death ray is a common McGuffin in these flicks, I thought that in this case, at least, the ray gun prop was pretty cool, and the simple special effects nicely executed.
1/2 tsp crushed caraway seeds
- Your debut song is already very strong.
their baby down, and get their
Tyrosine – Amino acid hydrolyzed from casein. Used in cosmetics and creams. Derivative: Glucose Tyrosinase.
I laughed, cried (can't say why don't want to spoil it for you), and even screamed at the end..... It was definitely an ending I didn't see coming. Well part of it I did, just not all of it. I can't say more without giving anything away. Okay I rambled enough , if you have read Keta's books before then you have to read this one and if you haven't then I say what are you waiting for...
Against her own people.
Order Details
Any fan should be ecstatic that Frances McDormand ,would even do the movie let alone give us a great performance . It did not stop at the idiot , it continued with more fans on the TFwiki Facebook page .Calling both Frances McDormand and Julie White ,old ladies .Really REALLY ,oh I see you don’t want a young whore ,but you also don’t like your women over thirty .
-Follow me on twitter and tweet this giveaway make sure you use @my2boyz and @sproutwatches in tweet leave link in comment (you can do this once a day-leave daily comment!)
The information given in this book is quite useful to those who feel at a loss when watching a loved one go through cancer. The fact that it is written by a former cancer patient makes it that much more meaningful. This is someone who has been there and knows what is really helpful and what isn't. She was fortunate enough to have friends and family who seemed to have instinctively known what to do to help her through her own ordeal. She also had extreme faith in God.
Any supply of money will work. Given a stable money supply ,as economies grow and become more productive, prices will trend downwards. Less money will be chasing more goods. The value of savings will increase. More and more items become affordable. Everybody enjoys an increasing standard of living.
So now that we’ve cleared up the ground rules, I am going to start a page entitled “Dear Olive,” so you can submit your inquiries using the “comment” link.
Ambatat-harastot-afraz-haramuz (mountains-farmers-horses-elephants)
No holds barred eh? Just 1 very big hold RPK, not even in Malaysia or running as a candidate . . . (also RPK’s too damn WHITE . . . warn to remove this part if any feel lawsuit inclined a$$es begin to itch . . .)
Disclosure: No position in stocks mentioned in this post.
Maggie grimaced. “So Declan did a good thing.”
Police said the attackers were all aged 15 to 17 and wearing dark clothing. The victims were walking along Glodwick Road towards Abbeyhills Road at 10pm on Saturday February 4th.
Pete Wishart MP, our host, was revealed to be the first MP to have appeared on Top of the Pops. He welcomed IPAN and WIPO to the House of Commons on a day which was about celebrating creativity. He encouraged us that Parliament getting more interested in IP, and, indeed, some other MPs were observed in the audience of the event.
So...I'm on my way to the first semi's in a short while. From what I know, two challenges will be handed out and each competitor is supposed to complete it and will be judged on creativity and taste. I have NO Idea what is to be expected but I'm going in to have lots of fun!
In the 2007 business year, which ran 7/1/07 to 6/30/08, DDDB raised $293,952 in direct public support and spent $411,764 on functional expenses, including $385,094 on program services and $21,963 on fundraising. That meant a deficit of $117,297 for the year, and less than $21,000 left over.
Zhu JL, Knudsen LE, Andersen AM, Hjollund NH, Olsen J. Time to pregnancy among Danish laboratory technicians who were a part of the National Birth Cohort. Scand J Work Environ Health 2005; 31: 108-114.
The carpet beetle is such a resilient pest, especially its eggs. Professional removal of a carpet beetle infestation may be necessary. A1 can help.
Who else is watching Mad Men now that it is back?! The 1960′s (and in the new season, 1970′s) vintage fashion of this hit series has inspired fashion designers since it’s premier on July 19, 2007. The long hiatus between the 4th and 5th seasons, has made the show even more popular. The beautiful vintage styles naturally have gone from the fashion world to the Wedding world, with couples all over the country searching for “Mad Men” inspired looks and decor to add to their Wedding. I have to admit, I am a fan of the show Mad Men and love the idea of incorporating vintage 1960′s and 1970′s style to your Wedding. Here is an inspiration board I created with Mad Men in mind!
David Fincher took on this adaption with mainly the same people he took on Mark Zuckerberg with a year ago but Dragon is a lot different than his previous effort. It may not be as dark as Seven nor as laid back as Zodiac but it hits a middle ground between those two films. Dragon may not be his best work but it is another solid film to add to his resume. From the very beginning you know you have walked into a Fincher film regardless of the association. Like most of his films there is a darkness that settles in as the credits roll and here they roll with one of the best opening credits scenes I have ever seen. Fincher works better tho when he doesn’t have guidelines so Dragon does show some fatigue as far as story goes. The film is a little too long and isn’t wrapped up neatly but Dragon is still a Fincher film. It feels like a one, it breathes like one, and it most certainly acts like one. Fincher may not have been the best director for this adaptation but he pulls off a dark and twisted world that is worthy of his own name.
During our first rehearsal, I forgot where I was going because I got distracted. He was so near, and I was touching him, our arms linked together. When we realized we were going in the wrong direction, I got defensive, and I was like Ikaw kasi, mali ung pinupuntahan mo! He said, Ikaw kaya ung mali, sinusundan lang kita! We were fuming at each other, so unlike the perfect couple that we were pretending to be.
Second, the cashback approach is not always an option where you travel. In my experience in Latin America, few retailers will charge more than the total due for fear of fraud.
Another seed shareholder listed in the registration statement is a company called Oil Search. It acquired 350,000 shares at one cent each. Post split, those shares have blossomed into 15,750,000 shares at an effective cost of about one-fiftieth of a cent each.
3. Playing at Disneyland, and the beach, and the mountains, and turning circumstance into sisterhood.
It's also revealed that Skip is actually Muffy's twin brother, and that Muffy didn't anticipate anyone bringing a gun along or having a bad reaction to her props(like Nan and the tape recorder). Then they party. A lot. Arch and Skip make the fake Arch head drink, Chazz makes the fake Muffy head go down on him, and Kit makes sure that everyone hoses Muffy down with champagne bottles. Heck, even Nan gets wasted, and finds out that the ferryman is her soulmate.
9 entire
Yet, the one thing that cannot be denied is the quality of the food. Yes, it’s true that price and quantity seem to be moving in opposite directions as the years go on, with the former rising as the latter falls. But while the value of the food may legitimately be called into question, the taste of it cannot. Spring Rolls, Cellophane Noodles with Crab, Caramelized Shrimp, Claypot Chicken, Sugar Snap Peas – all have held up extremely well since those early days on Valencia Street. But the very first dish from Phan that captivated me, the one I still view as a must-have on any visit and that tastes as good as ever, is the Shaking Beef. Tender cubes of filet mignon are sautéed with red onions and a soy vinaigrette, and then served with a pepper and lime juice dipping sauce. The result is outstanding.
When in my case it ever gets to that point i wont even hear what is playing. Nine out of ten I would be all knocked out by painkillers anyways.
I would run through more fields and gaze at more stars.
While this is quite the difficult recipe to master, it took a bit of watching Julia Child doing it on DVD and remembering not to follow the recipe step-by-step as oven temperatures might vary — cooking any challenging dishes also implies that you have to be in the moment and understand how you are building the flavours. Failing this recipe the first time was a blessing: I have learnt that you always have to do a taste test — otherwise you will be very disappointed when you serve your dish 6 hours later. “Pat your meat dry with paper towels, or they will not brown.” She also added, “Do not overcrowd your meat and mushrooms, otherwise they will not brown.” Her book further suggested using the oven to simmer at 325F will ensure the heat is evenly distributed. Stew can be prepared stove-top as well, but it will be your preference as there are many ways to prepare a good beef stew.
At the end of December 2011 the tenants received letters from the mortgage
Temporary highs with devastating lows.
Remember all that fabric my mom bought at an estate sale? Well, I finished making 4 Green Bag Lady shopping bags today. I thought these 3 could go to our winners tonight so they would have something to carry their spoils in.
All you’ll need to do is run each alt through the Children’s Week quests and pick a different pet. Then when the great pet collection merge of 2012 occurs, you’ll have all your Children’s Week pets together in one big happy family.
I had started recycling twice a week with grades four to six this year. It has been going well and I have a dedicated group. Since it had just been a long weekend, I was going to skip recycling today (usually Tuesdays and Fridays), so I was not worried about getting back to school after the bell. I failed to communicate this to my Recycling Leaders, though, and was surprised when I found that they started without me. Actually, to be honest I was dumbfounded. I walked quickly to the recycling area to see that the Leaders were all in their roles and had the students from each class lined up with their bins. Everything was orderly, just as if I had been there. I inquired as to how the classes knew when to come down and was told that one of the Leaders, a grade four student, had gone to the office and asked to make the announcement. She had only done this once before with me. I just stood there then taking it all in.
I’ve noticed a bit of an obsession with ghastly or graphic art in recent years, particularly on the part of the youth. Some of it appeals to me though not in any serious way. The leading subject matter of art such as this seems to be death: vampires, zombies, the living dead, being resurrected after death, blood sacrifice and other such morbid and dark subjects. I’m not sure where this trend came from but it certainly has been influenced in later years by the Twilight movies in particular I am sure. I’ve still not seen one of those films and I can’t imagine I ever will, as they simply don’t seem to appeal but I hear the rest of the world is in thrall to the extent of camping out on pavements etc etc to await the release of the latest film/book and it appears an entire sub-culture seems to have been founded upon the Twilight genre.
Red Hot White x
Sugar, as molasses, was traded from the Caribbean to Europe or New England, where it was distilled into rum. The profits from the sale of sugar were used to purchase manufactured goods, which were then shipped to West Africa, where they were bartered for slaves. The slaves were then brought back to the Caribbean to be sold to sugar planters. The profits from the sale of the slaves were then used to buy more sugar, which was shipped to Europe. The cycle would continue over and over. To read more, click on the link Triangular Trade at the bottom of the post.
Finally I came up with my own primitive design consisting of a boot lace and 2 chamois that covered both the front and rear to avoid the risk of upsetting the neighbours. The beauty of the design was that they allowed the greatest amount of freedom while being practical.
Yesterday I ran in the Hogeye 1/2 Marathon! Here’s how it went!
When asked about his religious practices, we learn that he goes to church every Sunday; this has always been profoundly important to him, he needs it. He is then asked point blank if he has ever had a romantic relationship and he answers, rather defensively, no -- it simply had never occurred to him you see, it wasn't something that was ever discussed in his family, and anyway, there would never have been the time, he was so busy with his work, his work, his work! Ten seconds after which he begins to cry. And then he perks up, the jolly mask returns, and it's like the previous moment had never happened. (How interesting that at a birthday party given in his honor at the Times, all attendees are wearing Bill Cunningham masks, in tribute.)
HOW is my sweet baby already 8 weeks old & sitting up in her Bumbo chair?!
The first day of school was today. Good thing you're not at my house right now, because I smell. Bad. Have I mentioned we don't have air conditioning? Have I? Have I mentioned I sweat more than anyone I know?
These are the gold standard of coffee spoons (literally - for an extra dollar per spoon you can get them sprinkled with gold dust). But buying 12 would help you stuff a stocking and maybe a little something extra to gifts for others; if you have to do a Secret Santa, for instance, or your kid's teacher is getting a card this year. Bonus points if you make your own chocolate-dipped spoons; there are all kinds of sites on the internet that give you detailed directions, and you could make it more special by using real spoons and high-quality chocolate.
On to today's bento...
How are you affected by standardized time,
Barbell Biceps Curls - 4 Sets of 12 reps with 32.5kg
Joseph… went up from the town of Nazareth in Galilee to Judea, to Bethlehem the town of David, because he belonged to the house and line of David. He went there to register with Mary, who was pledged to be married to him and was expecting a child. While they were there, the time came for the baby to be born, and she gave birth to her firstborn, a son. She wrapped him in cloths and placed him in a manger, because there was no guest room available for them. Luke 2:4-7
I’ve only heard glimpses of Lester’s story from my friend Baron Chase, Lester’s bassist and music director and neighbor. I’ve tried to get Lester to share his story with me, even completely in his own words with me just being the one putting his story down in black and white. He shies away from anyone who looks, acts, or smells like a reporter, at least when it comes to discussing his career or any hard times he’s been through. Otherwise, he’s as warm and friendly as can be. I think his “shyness” around reporters is mainly because he’s such a private person, he shies away from building himself up too much. So for Lester to share his story the way he did in a Facebook photo and to ask for help in making it “viral” around the world speaks volumes all by itself.
The recipe for this month is easy, but it’s going to make quite an impressive dish:
the sincerity of his warm smile as he sees you,
The friend kindly showed me the basics of how to pray it, it is in both Latin and English and I'd like to try but I'm a total beginner and I feel a little out of my depth even opening it up. I suppose anything alien to us is going to make us a little apprehensive.
I can't wait to see how they look up on the wall!
I love this hook rack that I bought at a local antiques shop called Good Goods last month. I was told
efforts come to naught, all relatives
Then a few years down the road I got all smarty pants like and painted all my walls and in the adjoining breakfast room - blood red!
Then we tried to explain what we was doing goin’ out with a Mexican lady.
So, you have decided to re-do your house and are torn between traditional and contemporary styles. But, when you picture your ideal decor, clean and soft lines with edged furniture is what comes to you mind. Contemporary furniture is definitely what you should be opting for.
You will shatter all watery crystal barriers,
We pore over shards and bones, treasures
grasp and discover some kind of switch.
Dwight McKissic is a Southern Baptist Convention pastor in Arlington, Texas. Pastor McKissic is one of the one's in 2009 who had called on the Southern Baptist Convention to adopt a resolution applauding the election of Barack Obama as America’s first African-American president.
Berry vs Finchel
Our brother in beer, Douglas spotted Full Sail's ESB (Brewers Share Series) at the Wine Store on 3rd East. Dougie describes it.... "Pours a clear copper hue with a medium white head. A sweet nose of floral hops and caramel, somewhat dusty. A nice quaffable flavor with distinct sweet and somewhat bitter hops, dry caramel malts, light fruit. Very drinkable. A big ESB".
The biggest problem I had back there was how thick the brush was around the edges of both the pond and the swamp. I think that I am going to do something I have never done before and clear a few very small “shooting lanes” through the brush in places so I can sneak back there from time to time and photograph the waterfowl.
01 Shake Dog Shake
Our son had talked us into buying his computer so that
The Minnesota based chain uses a process called “Fermentus Interruptus”, where the brewing is conducted at a central facility. The wort is then shipped to their individual locations (including the three Indiana locations), where the beer is fermented. The restaurant sells their beer as samples, pints, and growlers.
Vice-Captain aged 35 years
I highly recommend these covers, as I think they're the most economical way to get a high quality multi-size cover for a decent price. After 8 months the PUL still looks new (can't say the same for the Velcro...), and they perform super well.
While the world a superior vampire hunter is quickly whittling down the number of surviving Keepers. It helps he is the surviving son of a mutant hybrid strain Keeper experiment.
Absolutely gorgeous. So I thought I’d try something similar, but after a few attempts and several colour changes (like 5) by the bride to be, I kind of gave up on the whole pinwheel idea. They were fiddly and I just wasn’t getting a good result.
Thought I'd pass along that info for those of you who are looking for gluten-free spices.
its brother and sister clocks and watches,
33645 20th Ave S
I'm really excited to begin using this product and see if it makes a difference!
Decade Infernus (Black Lotus Records 2004 - Yellow Printing error on spine)
Today, I’m here to let you in on a little secret, TPS paralegals. It’s about the one thing you need to possess for just 20 seconds in order to succeed in the paralegal world, and for that matter, the “regular” world too. You Interested? Fantastic! Sip that cup of Joe or that ice cold Diet Coke, and delve right in, my friends. Your 20 second success plan awaits…
- If you do cook, use the most basic ingredients (cook pasta, bung sauce from a jar on it)
11:00am until 5:30pm. And then why not stay on and join us for dinner and drinks if you can?
Ramadam Kareem
This post is our response to the challenge set by the Kidspot Top 50 Bloggers competition based on the word Drive. It is a reflection on my drive and desire to become a Mother and how wonderful it is to be given the opportunity to reflect. The italics are snippets of my journal while undergoing fertility treatment. This is our success story and I am so happy to share it.
This book is beautifully and engagingly written and a must read for all.
König Heinrich: Matthew Best
Based on the results of that reading, the iridologist generally recommends a wellness program tailored to the individual’s physical, emotional, and life situation.
Will you be mine from now until death?
Connection is at the heart of Blogging.
Having heard that sentence of his, the well pleased auspicious one (sumangalA) smilingly thought of her dear Vishnu and said to the brahmin.
3. What's the best place & meal you've ever eaten? I think it would be the Valentine's Day dinner Jared and I had about 4 years ago at a restaurant in Scottsdale called Zinc Bistro. It was SOOOOOOOOOOO good and super expensive (we had a gift card), but Maggiano's is definitely a close 2nd place. That is my current favorite restaurant.
And there are an increasing number of other issues where I can play a leading role. There's the need to prevent the adoption of 'presumed consent' in respect of organ donation. The assumption and assertion that this will increase availability of organs for donation is unproven. And I can play a positive role in promoting changes which will bring about a real increase in organ donation levels - which is what will actually help those on the waiting list.
6. I'm mostly polite, even when I feel like killing.
32. Caffeine decreases melatonin production (the hormone that protects your cellular DNA).
Kairo and its remake Pulse are excellent examples of the cultural transformation that takes place with American remakes of J-horror. While many of the original meanings are lost, remakes can supply us with a study of our own cultural fears and how we handle them.
All I know right now is that I’m itching to make a change.
Science Class:
~Julie~
So even though my nerves got the better of me again and I was very wound up going into my appointment, I felt very confident and hopeful leaving the doctors office yesterday. I feel like we have all of our bases covered and that we are going to do everything possible to bring little Pooh home.
Brads, pearls, flowers, & ric-rack (My stash)
The sun rises with the same brilliance pouring through the window. Her morning routine of rushing through the first hours in complete hapless frenzy ends at nine. Then she sits, waiting for the day to end, moving through pages of books she must read, to seek comfort, to live in a fantasy, to rest in the dreams of others who she will never meet.
Clockblocker and Kid Win stopped walking and looked our way curiously.
What is CouchSurfing?
E@L may have time to relate somethings about this breif sojourn to his old stomping grounds tonight (it is lunch-time now, nearly the hour upon which he has to turn up at work - a seminar in one of the big hospitals just up the hill.)
Fabulous!!
What the heck was he thinking???
fly again and feel your presence,
All that wind is blowing in cooler air, after a high in the mid-seventies yesterday, the temperature is forecast to fall slowly all day long. So, it’s time to get out there and check it out for myself.
Work and other real life issues have kept me from posting anything since the beginning of last week. My hope is that things will ease up some beginning next week and I will have more gaming related posts here then.
Yeh. Personally, I fucking hate the Beatles, so I dunno why dude chose to use the subtitle "Beatles drum take" for the opener, "Bullet Proof Nothing." The song stands on its own. Super-duper-simple, bare-bones snare drum and echoing guitar notes set this tune apart: "waitin' for the morning ship that never came...."
Also... fold the laundry.
I do not blame my grandparents, one is disabled the other worked to provide for all of us, but looking back I wish I had those memories. My husband on the other hand went lots of places with his mom and talk about with fond memories. I want to make sure my children experience those same memories.
Original Air Date: Aug 8, 2011
It hasn't been that bad overall but I'm feeling signs of overload.
05-Sparks
Our final pumpkin outting was my favorite. The kids and I ventured out to Brunswick to hit up Mapleside Farms. It is truly a pumpkin and kid haven! There was a huge jumping pillow that Eleanor and I waited in a long line to jump on. When it was finally our turn she couldn't even jump and made me hold her AND try to jump! Needless to say the following pics, of me on the floor, were about the extent of our pillow jumping experience. The activities were endless at this farm: a huge slide which Mom and I did, a horse drawn carriage ride through the apple orchard, a little bouncy house for toddlers, a few corn mazes, a huge play ground, a pick-your-own-pumpkin pumpkin field, a wonderful little gift shop and the bakery. The bakery is what makes this farm my favorite. I'm not a huge fan of pie in general, least of all, fruit pies. But we all wanted pie and they were running short so dutch apple it was. Let me tell you, this was the best pie I've ever had in my entire life. I dreamed about this pie. I would do just about anything for this silly pie. I wish I had taken a picture of it, it was pretty and delicious. By the end we were all chilly, hungry and tired. So we ended the day at Cracker Barrell by the fire. Sounds like fall fantasy to me!
Los Angeles County sheriff’s deputies brutalized inmates on multiple occasions and their supervisors failed to take complaints of the abuse seriously,say sworn declarations from two chaplains and a Hollywood producer who volunteered in the jails, reports the Los Angeles Times. Two volunteers said they heard deputies yell “stop fighting” as deputies pummeled inmates who appeared to be doing nothing to fight back.
The text is from this blog post about Rin's adoption story. I copied and pasted it into a Word document, adjusted the margins so it would print out to be less than 4x6 and then edited it a bit to sound less like a blog post and more like journaling.
I feel bad for the girls who'll be standing next to me in the concert. Feel free to bring a tranquilizer gun, Natalie. I know you'll have the guts to knock me out should I become violent.
Black night, I left my quivering prints.
The tricky bit was making sure that the image was in the correct place so that it would pop out of the aperture in the card front smoothly. Of course I had to add a little bit of bling to finish it off!
Janet and Sylvia made it all look easy but I know what a lot of work that must have been, to gather the poems and get them set up and published. Thanks to both of them!!!!
9. Our Anniversary (6:44)
Tom: yeah!
Nutritional Information from Whole Foods:
Your monument shall be my gentle verse,
One of the themes that inspired the design is the idea of openness in government, and you’ll see glass walls throughout the building. There’s one second floor meeting room with glass walls and ceiling. It’s cantilevered out over the central atrium, and theoretically you could stand at the third or fourth floor balcony and look down through the room’s ceiling and read the papers and notes of the people meeting there.
I loved these books & can't wait to continue reading the rest of the series. I'm also excited for Season Five of True Blood. Apparently Chris Meloni from Law & Order SVU has been cast & I'm dying to find out which character he is. Quinn? Andre?
Although I still wonder why he didn't go pro. Obviously it's more respectable to dance to Brittney Spears and Michael Jackson than to save people's lives with medicine.
Here's a sampling of what I found today.
Closest Food Locations if not supplied:
Here is the inside of my card using the same designer paper I used on the outside and also the same number again … 2. I also added a sentiment from the Fairy Special stamp set.
This afternoon, the Allsop/Space auctioneering joint venture has published its catalogue for the third auction which will be held again in the Shelbourne Hotel on 23rd September. The catalogue is available here free of charge (might take a few seconds to load, the PDF is 10mb), if you want your personal printed copy it will cost you €5 and is available here. This entry takes a look at the catalogue and assesses the maximum reserves.
She couldn’t find the words...
Consumer and Print Media Changes
Who knows what is going to happen over the next 59 days – All I know is that I am going to stay as prepared as possible for any and all outcomes. That is all I can do!
April: "Well that's your opinion, I can have mine, too. It's ugly." (How many times does she need to say it's ugly?? And it wasn't.)
Although political and economic factors will obviously also play a role, the selection-process will focus on the best possible operating environment for the telescope.
TBB: What is your favorite interview question, and what is the answer?
I don't know if Luke Tull is merely a minor "friend" of this protagonist (Aaron) or if he's important to the story. Does it matter? Maybe not, but it's a curious problem to encounter.
They lost one of their opening fourteen matches, with eight and seven scored past Leicester City and Wolverhampton Wanderers respectively in successive weeks. The win over Leicester took Arsenal top of the table for the first time in the season. From that October weekend, they remained top for all bar one week when a 5 – 3 defeat at Villa Park saw them drop to second. It was a temporary blip, top spot reclaimed with a 4 – 2 win over Middlesbrough.
Why would that happen? It turns out that our short term memories are like hard drives – it’s possible to fill them up. Neuroscientists call this, “cognitive load”. While your frontal lobe is busy memorizing new numbers, a new task requiring a decision may not be routed to the rational part of the brain. Sometimes the emotional centers of the brain make the decision.
b. He casts down the wicked
He just did fit anymore.
2 tablespoons dried oregano
When we talk of spectaculars, we are, of course, making reference to the spectaculars pulled off by the PIRA in the 1990s in London and Manchester. These huge bombings, at the Baltic Exchange in 1992, Bishopsgate in 1993, and Canary Wharf and Manchester in 1996, caused devastation in the areas where they took place, some causing damage to the tune of hundreds of millions of pounds. In keeping with our earlier observations about IRA strategy, these bombings did not kill many people, especially when one takes into account their huge size: three people were killed at the Baltic Exchange, one at Bishopsgate, none in Manchester, and two at Canary Wharf. Their main objective was to cause financial damage and disrupt the everyday function of the areas they targeted.
It seems that wherever in this world that i go,
So, maybe as I trace my way through convoluted tradition and dusty old texts and shards of pottery, amidst ruins of ancient civilizations, perhaps there is mystery and wonder to be found and truth is not necessarily the realm of empiricists and skeptics but of poets and painters. I often think about the people who roamed these coastal areas before me. How did they see their life? What brought them meaning and joy? What would they say about themselves? What do our textbooks fail to tell of their stories and can these be rediscovered?
Step 1: Color a design on your coffee filter. I found it works best if you add lots of ink to each part.
2.Logic: Nagative logic(H=0, L=1)
There’s nothing particularly wrong about A Beautiful Mind or Chicago. They feature great production values, and excellent performances. In fact, I believe Russell Crowe should have won Best Actor for A Beautiful Mind, and NOT won for Gladiator (another day, Muchacho… Another day…). Chicago was being touted as the return of the big movie musical (except that nothing since then has been as good, and then they stopped again.) They’re both really good… I’m not denying.
But then we went in the toy store. I will admit defeat when I have to, y'all. BOY TOYS ARE SO FUCKING COOL OMG. They have fucking dinosaurs with robot guns on their backs, remote controlled sharks that will eat your face off, and army men battlefields all over the place. When we walked down the aisle with the full-size G. I. Joes, Andy kept saying, "Oh my God! My Army men would love this!" and "Sara, you have got to come over here immediately to see this Lego set" and "WE NEED TO HAVE A KID."
well, actually I used to live there for few years and went to high school.
The Tony decision process is often fraught with controversy and drama; such is the nature of the theatre world. I recognize the predicament of the Tony committee; the nomination process must be excruciating. There are so many deserving productions/performers and only a limited number of nomination slots for each category. How does one choose a favorite among a sea of solid contenders? So many examples of “good theatre” are happening at once that it seems impossible to narrow down choices.
Lysius was an unbeliever. That is obvious. He did not have the Holy Spirit. That, too, is obvious. So in verse 11, “the things of God knoweth no man, but the Spirit of God.”
Anwaar: No!
Plus b/c I'm a brain dead mama of 5, it plans out the lessons for me...which is worth gold to me these days!
It took some maneuvering with implements other than hands, but I removed the carcass and added it to the nearest muck bucket.
Hope to see you on the other side.....
Author’s Note
And, to my (really, my sister's) sewing machine, I'm sorry to have doubted you.
So, I looked up apple picking online, and found a great review for this adorable little organic orchard, "Apples and Art". It starts with an apple talk, then you get to go pick, and at the end, you get to make cider.
It’s not falling down that determines your worth; it’s whether or not you get back up.
So, I must say, March was an awesome month! The weather was awesome! I am way ahead of half marathon training at this time this year than I was at this time last year.
Some simple rules to follow:
For those of you who are totally oblivious to the fact (probably most of you), Tuesday 27th March 2012 is ‘World Whisky Day’.
I have decided recently to embark on a 30-day Paleo challenge. Typically, these challenges are put on by a group or organization where numerous people can join in and share their results. A nutrition challenge is certainly a lot easier to adhere to when you have the motivation of others participating in the same challenge. Since I could not find anyone who was “hosting” a challenge at the moment, I decided I would do this on my own in order to jumpstart my competition prep for the 2012 season.
I still admire Catholicism; who knows, I might covert anyways for reasons I may post about later. For now, I will continue my exploration and further discernment.
We stopped by the photo lab to pick up Joe's b-day invites, and they couldn't find the order. Oh, I was mad. I'd sent it in on Saturday. They should have been there. Sigh. Oh well. At least now I'm not out the $4.00. I just left everyone the picture on their facebook account. Sorry, to all my friends without a facebook account..... Anyway, it was frustrating.
As in James L. Rubart’s novel where a chair is not just a chair, a book written for spiritual purpose is not just a book. When writing it, we feel it takes all–everything we have and then some. But after it’s done, often a good while after, we see that it gave more than it took. To the author who wrote it, and to the readers who connect with it.
He hasn’t won in almost four years (back when the housing market tanked) but this could (finally) be the night Dale Earnhardt Jr. gets the giant, no-win monkey off his back. He told reporters last week that he was the best driver at Hendrick Motorsports. If not winning in four years makes you the best, then he’s right. I’m trying to remember something….didn’t his teammate win five straight Championships? Yes he did. Jimmie Johnson must be the worst driver for Rick Hendrick then.
In an infamous scene from Barry Levinson’s Diner, Steve Guttenberg’s character forces his fiancée to take a football quiz. If she passes, they’ll get married; if she fails, the marriage is off. It’s that straightforward.
Can we predict human behavior or natural cyclical occurrences?
Sal Khan, an MIT and Harvard graduate, is attempting to change the way we educate our youth. Khan created a free online program originally to help one of his cousins that was struggling to learn algebra. What started as something for a small audience took off and now Khan Academy has grown to over 4 millions users a month. His goal is to help teach a variety of subjects in a different way to make it easier for those who are struggling to learn and also to ”to provide a free, world-class education for anyone, anywhere.” In just 8 years, Khan has uploaded over 3,000 lessons including math, science and history. Helping him reach his goal and create this Academy have been Bill Gates and Google who have funded over $15 million to help promote this new kind of education. This new form of online education is now being tested in schools across the country.
-Lions,
The President of the CFR is Richard Haass, a member of the Jesuit-controlled Bilderberg Group (Founded by Jesuit priest Joseph Retinger, S.J. and SMOM Papal Knight Prince Bernhard of the Netherlands). During his time in the US State Department, Haass was a close advisor to Colin Powell, a 33rd Degree Freemason (Admitted on Masonic websites) who addressed the Roman Catholic Marymount University in 2006. Haas was also the US Special Envoy for Northern Ireland, which is 40% Roman Catholic as a country. Haass also served as a special assistant to George H.W Bush, the Knight of Malta, member of the Vatican-controlled Bohemian Club, High-level Freemason, and Skull & Bones Papal Knight of Eulogia. Haass is also a Rhodes Scholar (Rhodes Scholarships have been given out to Jesuit grads, in many cases).
Because of its 140-character limit, tweeters replace letters with numbers – I waz 42n8 2 c 22 on 2sday; a 1derful m8 – which can be disconcerting for those of us who aren’t fluent in Sudokuese.
You will be changed. This you have always known. This you have asked for. It is, in fact, the answer to your prayers which you thought was not coming. You understand, of course, that we have just given you something to contemplate or meditate upon. Listen to this music in your hearts, enjoy it, and go ahead and dance if you are so inclined. Listen to your notes blending in and feel the power of the music rising. See the change in your world which this wave will push ahead of itself. See the peace and love which it leaves in its wake.
Grammar for Students
In her book, MOMumental, Jennifer Grant shared a lesson she’d been taught by a college professor: Prefer the given.
Maintaining a desirable body weight also is important. People who are 20% or more over their ideal body weight have an increased risk of developing coronary artery disease or stroke.
“Innovation and advancement in security technology are vital as the security sector strives to stay one step ahead of the global terrorism threat,” said Steve Swain, CEO of the U.K.-based Security Innovation and Technology Consortium (SITC), and former director of London’s Metropolitan Police International Counter Terrorism Unit. “Breakthrough technologies from companies like BRS Labs play an important role as the security industry pushes forward to combat today’s threats. Video surveillance intelligence, collection and analysis are key components of any counter terrorism program.”
*He actually says 10, but then changes his mind when you talk to him again, stating 1.
We never asked for, nor were we asked if we wanted, the new invasion, not by proud conquering warlords, but by cringing Third World masses who the elites showed favour over us and with whom we have nothing in common. The elites wanted cheap labour and their historic guilt expiated while they lived peacefully in fine areas.
Emily and Noah arrived today. They are our "Gardening Angels" who will be helping us with the work of the farm for the next week to 10 days. Lurah, Hollis Dale, and Richard mowed. Green grass, rain, and cool temperatures make for quite the stand of grass. As for today, it was hot and steamy.
Use gender identifiers according to your friend’s preference, not genetic origin. For example, if a genetically female friend identifies as a male, quietly and privately ask whether male pronouns are preferred. This is particularly important if the person presents as the opposite sex.
which has generated more health complaints
Me: “Come on Nick, pick something!”
Would you give up on trying to make the pain stop and go back to your life?
Gwyneth Paltrow (Glee)
Anyhoo, as I am frequently want to do, I'll leave the driving to someone else as it relates to an "official position" on these horrific Norwegians murders.
Here's a great twist on finger foods: eggplant fries. Delicious, healthy eggplant made even more delicious and a bit less healthy by breading and frying it into yummy fries.
I choose to be a good father, husband, uncle, grandfather, great grandfather, brother, son, cousin, friend, neighbour in Jesus Christ Name I pray! Amen!
Fabio is Fabio of Top Chef fame, and while we had no expectations of actually seeing him that night, we weren't disappointed.
Sunday night TJ and I decided to do the worst thing we could possibly do: take "before" pictures. It was horrifying. I wanted to call every one of my friends and ask,
Just one of our many pieces, Gary Neal, always seems to find a way to shoot late nails in coffins with his play. He would score 6 in the 4th. But halfway through the 4th, the Lakers would wave the white flag, and put in Jordan Hill & Andrew Goudelock. DeJuan Blair, with 6 4th-Q pts., Jack, and Mills would bring it home, with our stars resting. For the 4th straight game, we win by 21+. The 121-97 Spurs WIN effectively proved to the national media, and more importantly to the Lakers themselves, that the road to the 2012 Championship certainly goes through San Antonio! For the first time in almost a year, the Spurs' big-3 all scored 20+! San Antonio's pts. differential in our last NINETEEN games is +12.6, and that includes our 7 and 14 point back-to-back losses at Utah and at home in that terrible Lakers game, respectively! Here is the Spurs/Lakers III boxscore..
at a new price of $4,599,000 December 28, 2010. 106 days after that, it sells (hooray!) for $3,963,591 on March 25, 2011. A grand total of 970 days waiting for a buyer! And if you started the clock the day they closed on the tear-down? We’re looking at a 1,885 day saga. Ughhh.
Pull: Simplex T-Bar. Smokes: System Sensor i3.
After our little tour of St. Michan’s we had to decide what was next on our agenda. We got back on the bus after a quick stop at the Four Courts. Mia and Sam really wanted to see the Guinness brewery and storehouse, I wanted to take the girls to Trinity College and see the Book of Kells, Sherri really wanted to go to the library to do some genealogical research while we were here and our time was running short. I offered to take the kids to the Guinness brewery and storehouse so that Sherri could go and do the research she wanted to do but in an act of selflessness that only reinforces what an utterly incredible and awesome wife she is, she would take Mia and Sam to Guinness while Margaret, Mary Kate, and I went to Trinity College to see the Book of Kells.
So why prep at all? It's way to complicated to put in one paragraph or to repost each time, so I encourage you to read these posts. I've provided a Prepping Basics Index so you don't have to scroll down through every post, but you can jump to each one directly. And hopefully soon I'll have it up on the side bar!
Because you chanted
I plan to place a basket on the counter to store the dry goods (chips, pretzels, etc). Everyone can just grab what they need as they pack their lunch. I am thinking I will need 2 baskets. One for "lunches only" and one for "anytime snacks". If I don't lay down the law, all the chips for the week will be gone by Tuesday. LOL!
I love roadside Florida, the tackier the better, so I was delighted to happen upon this mexican tin and pottery junkyard that was situated under some beautiful oaks at the crossroads where one tractor trailer after another passed by loaded with either slash pines or oranges.
The Government’s recent changes to the Reporting of Injuries, Diseases and Dangerous Occurrences Regulations (RIDDOR) will mean that employers only have to report injuries that keep workers away from their normal duties for more than seven consecutive days – an increase from the previous three-day reporting period. We should therefore expect a reduction in the number of accidents reported. The HSE estimates there will, as a result, be 30,000 fewer reports a year.
Sheik Yousuf Al-Qaradhawi: Brother, are you comparing the Arabs with the Zionists who plundered my land, spilled my blood, and drove my people out?
This one's rated at 200lbs, which I got just to be safe. The mirror probably only weighs maybe 40 or 50lbs, but I dont like to take my chances, especially with drywall. Surprisingly, the instructions said there were no drywall inserts (or studs) needed. We were both a little skeptical, but it came with fancy drywall screws and Brad thought it'd be ok. Here he is installing the two parts:
And OK we did all enjoy the antics of The Wobbly Thong and The Crafty Pint gathering video footage which will either form part of a magnificent on-line production or allow them to receive free beer from several brewers forever by NOT allowing the footage to see the light of day. But, really apart from that and the other Super-happy-terrific Funshow that was going on upstairs – you didn’t miss anything.
When the mother heard of the ghastly massacre of her children she began to wail and weep. Then the famous Arjuna, with tears in his own eyes, pacified her by saying, “I will wipe away your tears, oh auspicious woman, when I give you the head of that so-called brahmin, pierced with the arrows of my bow. Then, stand on it while you take the bath you must after cremating your children.”
We can change this life
The American National Rugby League international program shifts up a gear in May when the USA Tomahawks take on the Tonga Mate Ma’a in Honolulu in the ‘Ohana Cup, which will be a perpetual trophy and symbol to commemorate competition between the USA Tomahawks and Pacific Nations. As part of Hawaiian culture, ‘Ohana means family, and given the large Polynesian communities in the Hawaiian Islands, and the close proximity to a number of rugby league nations in the pacific region, it is a fitting name to launch many future international matches.
Eric and I discussed possible texts to send back, most of them were pretty snarky. But I didn't want to ruin Donna's celebration. And now. Well, now I feel almost too embroiled in Keri's life to just suddenly start texting back, "Hey! Wrong phone number, but congrats on the no cancer spreadage!" And part of me is wondering, if Donna and Keri haven't sorted this out yet, after four years, then maybe they're just not very good friends. Maybe Keri intentionally never gave Donna her new phone number. Maybe I'm doing Keri a favor by not responding.
2010: Aubrey Huff (7th)
Note: You are basically going to make a tube out of your fabric and diaper and close it much like the Baby Blanket I posted the other day.
Nick: "Michael, tell your mom to pray for us that we will make it to the gas station."
I was sitting in a car, listening to music turned down very low, and reached over to turn one of the nobs. As I did, I got the singular sense that I was looking at someone else's hands and said out loud, "oh my God, those are hers. They're so small and precious!" (Isn't that funny? My own out-of-body experience got a little conceited.)
Poblano’s is another locally owned restaurant in my area. It is located on Eldridge Parkway, in what the Houstonians call the “Energy Corridor” because this part of town has a lot of the major energy company “campuses (multiple buildings per company” here is their website: http://poblanosmexicangrill.net/. Unfortunately, they are currently re-designing their website, but they do have a PDF of their menu listed here, if you are interested. They also have a facebook page, and are listed on YELP.
We have great neighbors. This is, by the way, why we stay where we are, as our property taxes soar higher every year, rendering us perilously close to being priced out of the neighborhood that we "discovered" eight years ago. Back then, my neighborhood didn't say "very desirable, cute. midcentury-modern 50's bungalows." It said "Wow, we can only afford this tiny little piece of crap with ancient plumbing if we want to live anywhere near the central city."
Love is open on your house
“Chris!” Donna ran up to him and gave him a tearful hug. “I heard – I thought – I thought you were dead!” She hugged him again, then stepped back to look at him. “Oh my God, how is this possible?”
3. It's Complicated
One of the very first inspiration boards I ever posted was inspired by The Secret Garden, and when I saw this post over on Dress Design Decor a couple of weeks ago, I immediately wanted to revisit the theme (and hopefully improve upon it). Faded blue, vintage keys, overgrown vines, and romantic stationery pull the look together, while a chandelier hung in a tree, a unique candelabra, and paisley printed linens add something unexpected.
Any other comments/observations/general mind-blowing information you‘d like to add?
when you go to a wedding
Did you read The List?
The Mia cleanses, reduces pores, even fine lines and wrinkles will appear to be reduced with routine use.
The new generation of revolutionaries cannot avoid responsibility for that by indulging in shortcuts and weightless abstractions. When, in the last decade of Marx’s life, he witnessed the unprincipled, empty rhetoric for unification of two socialist organizations, he insisted, in his sharp critique, that only an internationalism unseparated from principles of revolution-in-permanence could become the ground for organization.[4]Otherwise, Marx cautioned, the unity should be limited to unity of action against what is, while one continued to work out theory as ground for principled unification. First of all, it was necessary to clear one’s head.
According to the story, Sahibañ, once, when struck by the maulvi for not memorizing her lesson correctly, addresses him thus:
You can follow me on:
I’m going to be very specific about the flavor I had, well, because I don’t have anything nice to say about it. It’s possible the other flavors are better, but I’ll be in no hurry to try. To be blunt, it tasted like what I imagine weak sewage to taste like. The primary culprit seemed to be the PB flavoring, as it was worse when I bit that side tongue down. I’d also say, it tasted nothing like PB. I could tell it was trying as it was somewhere in the right city, but not anywhere close. I battled my way through the box to not waste anything, but it was not fun. In addition to the taste, as with other 90 calorie bars, if you find those unfilling, you’ll find more of the same here.
Haiti has offered a gentle welcome with the kind of gorgeous days that remind me of the beginning of a midwestern summer: hot sun coupled with the lingering cool breezes of spring. The air fragrant with smoke and vegetation welcomes me back after leaving the sterile, scentless airport air. I’m happy to hear the gobble of the neighbor’s turkey who miraculously survived two major holidays. I smile at the sound of music that rides the wind day and night: kompa merging with hip-hop fading into church hymns and accented with the tinkling of the water trucks' endless tune (still either Celine’s Heart Going on or a Christmas medley that jingles all year long). After 10 days of broad white landscapes, the popping colors of Haiti look like an oil paint canvas of color: palm tree green, dusty street brown, the rainbow collage of market colors—tomato red, lime, leafy and chili pepper green, bean white, red, and black, and carrot orange all under a sky Caribbean blue.
A while back I was used-book browsing when I came across a copy of James Moffatt’s “Everyman’s Life of Jesus” (published by Hodder and Stoughton in 1924). I had read somewhere once that Moffatt’s translation of the New Testament was one of C.S. Lewis’s favorites. Remembering this, and combining it with a desire to read a life of Jesus, this volume seemed like a fortuitous pick.
#2: On the Far Side of the Mountain (1990)
That's a good thing too. In an ever-evolving field, who wants to be tied to one term?
981. – Dinner at Guatemala Antigua (Phoenixville, PA) –
By Rance Crain
Well, the tides turned when this friendly neighbor lost his house to foreclosure. I wish that on no one, but there are consequences to your actions, and he didn’t lose the house to downsizing or a failing economic system. He lost it due to his own erratic and irresponsible behavior. Losing his house wasn’t a shock to us, but what was a shock is how he moved out. He just left. And not only did he leave behind a crap hole for the bank to deal with, he left behind the horse and the two dogs trapped in a pen with no food or hay or water.
Happy Monday….well end of it at least. Today has been a pretty inspiring day for me and a day filled with wonderful conversations!
He conceived of the museum more than a decade ago, at the same time he came up with the idea for the novel. A New York Times bestseller, “The Museum of Innocence” was his first book after winning the 2006 Nobel prize for literature.
Delirium Tremens Belgium, Belgian Strong Ale, 8.5% abv
You have taken what was offered.
The Mohawks can revitalize the Iroquois Confederacy. In 1784 Deseronto, settled in Tyendinaga. Joseph Brant left Tyendinaga with17 families to start Brantsford on the banks of the Grand River, Six Nations.
Praying that this Lenten season brings you closer to God.
If you answered yes then here’s what you need to remember: Forget your family! They have done nothing but hold you down this entire trip. Whether it’s getting explosive diarrhea or getting bit by rattlesnakes, they are constantly asking you to ‘Rest’. And you need to tell them NO. I don’t care if it’s something as small as a cold, to a broken ankle, they need to suck it up and keep Trailin’.
In her latest posting on Facebook, Nicole wrote the increasing number of such reports is worrying which has led to greater insecurity and loss of confidence in both commuters and pedestrians alike.
I loved that Julia Quinn created this cinderella tale within the Bridgerton series. Although the book you were hoping that Benedict would see but he doesn’t well that is until the very end.
I am on a kick to learn how to make different paper flowers. These two I made are a Begonia and a Camellia. I used my bone folder to curl the flowers. Then, I sponged the edges. Finally, I added a small pearl for the center. I kept the card simple, clean and elegant. It's a perfect card for anyone.
in the golden west.
Estimated OG = 1.046. Actual OG = 1.036.
Because we can have from zero to eight committees selected by each volunteer we must set up a foreach loop to iterate over the array $commA. In each iteration we bind the parameters. Committee should change each iteration but Volunteer ID will stay the same. We then execute the prepared statement which inserts the record. When the execution completes we increment our counter. When the loop completes we should have inserted a record for every member in our array; therefore, our array count should be equal to our counter. If the counts are not equal we return false. False signals that the transaction failed and the transaction is rolled back. If all three table inserts are successful the transaction is committed.
Mayhaps we pressed too hard.
Before I left, though, David and I had dinner with my friends Sondra and Stephan, who have a new baby. This involved our making dinner at our house, packing up a small catering operation and hauling it down the road to their house. We wanted to leave them with enough food for another meal, since their lives are so hectic right now.
locked all in amber
Today is a month away from my 30th birthday!!!
I still remember the first time I saw him, standing in my friend Becca's driveway. My first thought? "Crap. He's cute." How romantic.
What’s your preference? Comments, please!
The health insurance industry sure does make a lot of sense and is in no way counter-intuitive at all.
However, the rich, wealthy privileged supporters of the EU ( and they are invariably a specific class of people who despise the "poor and unwashed " such as the Oxbridge educated, chianti drinking, Liberal Democrats living in Islington who feel more at home in their holiday homes in Tuscany than they are dealing with "those ghastly English people") who invariably ignore jobs lost when done so by their favourite institution. They even ignore it when the Commission make it clear that they don't actually give a damn about British jobs.
Let me know if you ladies are interested for a review on the elf Studio brushes and the elf Beauty Eye Manual. You can also check out my review on the elf Beauty Encyclopedia Face Edition HERE.
That they got some dates wrong. I was at Art College for the 3 day week, which, according to this film happened several years later than it did.
Jo Archer recently asked me if I'd had any of my work exhibited and I'm delighted to report that over the last 12 months, examples of my iPhoneography have featured in five exhibitions in Germany (Berlin); USA (New York and Kansas); Italy (Milan); and here in the UK (Bristol). Three of the photos are posted above.
But while those reasons are all valid and in many ways compelling, the days that the wall appears are the most important days for me to write. Because I prove to myself that I can. Rain or shine, I show myself that I can scale that wall. And hopefully, greener pastures are lurking on the other side.
To give you an idea of the type of art you can expect in the book, see the below examples from Rob Ryan’s store on etsy.co.uk:
B. agreed fully with the Old Guard on the issue of slavery.
Because Thobeka is just one of Mr Zuma's four living wives, not including one from Mozambique who committed suicide in 2000. She is also one of the estimated ten women with whom the libidinous Zuma has sired the 20 children he acknowledges to be his own.
Recently I started thinking back to specific books that caught my interest and sent me into a new world–the next thing you know I’m a huge science fiction fan. Or a huge historical romance fan.
and to say thank you, I am offering three bags as a GIVEAWAY.
Wolfe LA, Mottola MF. Aerobic exercise in pregnancy: an update. Can J Appl Physiol 1993; 18: 119-147.
Alex and I jumped right back to wherever we had been a few weeks ago. This was, officially, our second real date but we had run into each other a couple times in the interim. It was new enough that I still had no idea what to think when I was with him. Sure I felt the butterflies but he's in advertising (and a successful advertiser to boot) and I have a feeling he knows how to sell a product regardless of how he feels about it. Yet he was quite the perfect person to share the sunset with, we both sighed over Manhattan, discussing how we had actually dreamed to live here when we were kids, and how we had finally made it in the city we could now call home. I think I pointed out every cloud, every glimmer off the water, each criss-crossing beam and jagged edge, over and over. I just wanted to continuously shout "Look! Look! Look at our city, look at what we have."
I hope I can convince my dad that I can live by myself, alone, in an apartment so I can finally be free from all your crap. I don't have to show anyone but dad that I can do it alone, that I'm growing up and that I can take care of myself.
(they are the ones on the right).
This picture was taken at Disney World the weekend before your brother was born. It’s one of my favorites, because later this same night, I fell asleep on the couch and was awakened when I sensed someone standing there next to me. When I woke up, I saw you standing there proudly displaying the contents in your hands. You had gotten out of your toddler bed to play in the cat box! And you brought me the prizes to share! Our poor cat, Socrates was so confused…
Send me no more
investment (state)/spending
Dig, if you will, a picture:
What a coincidence huh?
Yet whose lid is tightly sealed with tar.
Bryan flinched and grinned. “Oh yeah, you’re my kind of lady, Mara. You can take the flirts and dish ‘em out.”
So hang on to me, girl
You will often find squawroot growing in patches. After flowering, it darkens over time; later in the summer it might even look like a pile of burnt pine cones.
I might let some be the mummies and daddies of the next batch. Not sure how well they grow through the winter though. I wonder if I should grow them in the shed?
It would be great if it came back on website only, however, not everybody has the internet. A lot of people in rural areas would still lose the show so I can't help but feel it should still be on TV as it deserves that platform. I personally feel, the Red Button could be a possibility. So after Doctor Who you could press your red button and access the show that way.
Don't laugh. When the "majority" took over in South Africa," the first targets were our national symbols".
Whose “interest”? Whose “justice”? Umno’s brand of justice? How would peace and harmony be disturbed if charges were pressed against the reporters? It appears there is really no rule of law in this country but the mob rules – even in the discerning and decision making process of the Attorney General!
The original recipe, as posted on the English Kitchen, called for sour cream. I went with Greek yogurt instead. Same consistency but with a healthy edge.
1/2 pound ground beef, browned, drained
And so ends the week of May 23-30 in the year 2011. Although it just a snapshot, it outlines a country, a government and a people whose civilisational timeline is now measured in years rather than decades or centuries. We are no longer serious about the serious matter of survival. We have nowhere to turn and no one to realistically represent us. Britain, as Lawrence Auster constantly reminds us, is a nation of the living dead.
We were there for only about 15 minutes, when the guy made his move. He spotted most of us swooning over his good looks, so he made his way over to us. I was secretly hoping that he would ask me to dance. I really thought our children would be beautiful. We started whispering, “Oh, my God, he is going to ask one of us to dance, I can tell,” and “He’s looking right at me..sorry guys..” Well he was coming our way. He was walking right towards me. Yay! It was me.
5 In The Midnight Hour/It's Not Easy (Co and Ce 245) 1967
My parents sold the laundromat mostly because of a major highway that was going to cut right in front of their business. Today it's an "Indian Trading Post" in Oklahoma City, Oklahoma.
While Staci's kids and I held the banner.
all of the hard work put into the club by all of our volunteers over many
Could probably fit a baseball up there,
So – I am stuck. Can’t get to work. Can’t call in, because somehow, my available time off (without penalty) is off. My calculations of excused time don’t match up with my bosses. If I can’t get that figured out, then I am taking a hit behavior and attendance wise. (including a written warning – for ME – who has never had any kind of written ANYTHING when it comes to work…) And yet – that is where I ended up. Couldn’t get there in time for it to be even HALF a point – so….
About which tens of readers might
Lowlights – Like last time, the one I wanted to win got knocked out.
Edit.
We recently bought a Libman Gator mop from Amazon for my Uncle. At the time it was $13.58 and Free Prime Shipping (It's changed now, maybe they realized the shipping was way more than that.) So this afternoon we received the mop and here it is.
TTPS come out with their guns blazing to…if they called to investigate, they have to investigate. Damned if you do, damned if you don’t, is their new motto.
All in all, make an informed decision when making offers. It is a numbers game. You may have to make several offers before you are able to buy a home. Hang in there and be loyal to your agent. They know you and will work for you before, during and after the transaction.
Active listings are DOWN (slightly)
I think I’ll tell you a little more about our Slow Food experience, Kobus van der Merwe and Oep ve Koep. I have been foraging around the internet to find out a little more about slow food and veld food, and Kobus’s name always pops up. Once on the Slow Food Mother City’s site though I found a really interesting little tidbit – they were organising a trip out to Oep ve Koep for a 5 course meal, along with an hour long dune walk with a botanist. The reason behind the dune walk was to explain where Kobus found some of his veld food ingredients; how the changing landscape along the West coast sustains so many varieties of fynbos etc; to just help us identify what would be edible and what could be poisonous out there in the wild, and to show off the awesomeness that is the West coast in winter.
In Holmes and AD&D multiple attempts are not allowed and so the "2 rounds" part doesn't matter, and the above is just the chance of turning 4 zombies in these versions. Moldvay, as mentioned in this post -- and this jibes with my experience -- is typically interpreted as putting no restrictions on the number of attempts. In the black book (1991), however, “once a cleric fails an attempt to turn undead, all his other attempts during the same battle also fail.”
Now, I’m back in the room. I’ve finished my homework, and now I’m about to shower before bed. Goodnight, everyone!
I have been really judgemental in life and most days I come home going over the events of the day and think to myself “I need to be less judgemental and be more loving like my Savior.” Well, today was one of those days. I’m really hard on my family and I’ve realized that when I start to judge them, I in turn take on their burdens by thinking about how I would run my life if I were them…but I don’t help at all, I just make it harder.
I am just home after seeing M, and I need to write or else the session will become a vague memory, and there's a big possibility that I will block it completely.
It is more likely a clarion call or a symptom of my potential approaching curmudgeon-ness that I feel it is important to fly the tricolour of yellow, black and red and remind any naysayers that the produce of Belgium - a country roughly the size of beloved Yorkshire - is worthy of your full appreciation.
your feet. Read it slowly, frequently,
Bernhard
In a trail that leads to nowhere
And finally, for now, a few random photos of the graveyard.
Preacher's Blues by Lee Connors
to suicide. Designed to reach a wider demographic than those willing to
JS – What will happen now? Sheridan will be released, the Scottish part of the public inquiry will be a whitewash as will the police investigation into police collusion/corruption, and Sheridan will be back in court looking for his £200,000 which has already gone to pay McNeilage. No doubt Sheridan will be armed with a copy of Alan McCombe’s book to show exactly what a shady organisation he is up against, and then there’s the NotW.
* Clean out your humidifier once a month with bleach and/or alcohol to get rid of any mold or germs.
“And I just put my coat on,” said Andrew, smiling; Raymond noticed him doing this like a gun had just been shot right near his ear; he must have genuinely meant it.
I would play with toys and create a world with them, as my imaginary friend would participate and help create a narrative, scene, introduction, crescendo, fights, all of that stuff that boys of young age are supposed to surmise.
But if there is good news for the Catholic Church it is clearly that baptisms, marriages and funerals are still considered important by “Catholics”. “Four wheel Christians?”……pram, limousine and hearse….but clearly 84% of Irelands population (Republic and North) want to be “hatched, matched and dispatched” according to the rites of the “Holy Catholic Church”.
2 I experience shame when I look wrongly at another. Likewise, I experience shame when another looks wrongly at me. Discuss how both instances of shame serve to protect the dignity of the person.
Slice the tomatoes and arrange on top. Melt the remaining 2 tablespoons of butter, combine them with the fresh bread crumbs, and sprinkle on the top. Bake for 30 to 35 minutes in a preheated 375 degree F. oven, or until the sauce is bubbly and the macaroni is browned on the top.
I have discovered this absolutely brilliant UK website, Cuddly Buddly, that sells a variety of scrapbooking and card making products, including stamps, both rubber/clear and digi and they are absolutely gorgeous!!! I have absolutely fallen in love with the "Wee Stamps" range and this is "Sweet Blossom" .... isn't she just soooo cute? You really need to jump on over and have a look at their website .... you won't be disappointed.
Originally I started a yarn stash because I lived too far away from decent yarn stores, but now that I realize my rhythm is off-beat, so to speak, and if I had to do it over, I would purchase as needed with the exception of your basic colors. Live and learn. But in the meantime, I'm going to work my stash down like nobody's business. :-)
The alleged robber, who suffered a gunshot wound to his stomach, was transported to a local hospital. He is expected to survive.
Papers: Papertrey Ink's White, Tan cardstock, Green Cardstock, Georgia Pacific White, DP by My Mind's Eye and MemoriesComplete
Suddenly nothing matters to you, beside
My time is lost and scattered.
At The Sunday Whirl, Brenda and The Whirl are having their one year anniversary and celebrate with words sent in by wordlers. Visit to see the wordle and to read what others have done.
But note: this success didn't come to her out of thin air. It came about through her determination to rise above adversity; her ability to create something positive from the most negative of circumstances; days, weeks and months of sheer hard work; the generosity of her spirit and the magic of her own imagination.
Hi everyone! I am excited to announce that I am now teaming up with finnish jewellery designer Lapponia and giving away this beautiful silver 'Paloma' ring that I personally picked out for you! Designed by Björn Weckström, who was inspired by the graceful motion of a dove in flight. The winner will get to pick the size.
Two days ago, at Savannah's softball game, the little kids were lying on the ground coloring with markers. Clay got bored coloring and stacked 3 markers together in a kind of makeshift light saber. Because playing with weapons is always a good idea. Anyway, this looked like fun to Brooklyn who did the same thing. Except she decided she wanted ALL of the markers so she ran around, chasing Clayton, screaming and whining that she wanted his markers too. Right on cue, Clay took off teasing and taunting her just to make her scream a little louder because not everyone within a 15 mile radius could hear her.
She dims
I think I've transfered my important bookmarks!
As long as my neighbour doesn’t start mowing the lawn at 8 am sundays, I couldn’t care less what he or she does.
Actually, I’m not entirely sure I’ll be able to participate myself! I have not yet discovered any Australians (or New Zealanders) in my family tree who died in military service. I may have to have a chat with my co-conspirator Seonaid (@genebrarian) about whether I can bend the rules a little…
LEARN TO USE, CLEAN, FIX AND SHOT YOUR FIREARMS
Affected not by boxes
I can’t think of a way that this could get any worse for Barack Obama, but that doesn’t make it impossible! After all, today is a new day and there are always new ways for our dear leader to screw up!!
Time of Day: Midnight
However what stands out from this newspaper report like a flashing red beacon is NAMA’s position on the sale where there appears to be a complete abdication of responsibility by the Agency for getting the best price for the property. NAMA seems to be saying that there was an initial valuation which suggested a price and the price now achieved by Savills was in excess of that price. It is not clear who provided the “initial valuation” – was it Savills themselves or NAMA or someone else? But regardless of who provided the valuation, the common understanding at present in the business is that there are so few transactions of development land that it is difficult to assess what the market value is. If NAMA or its agents had opened the sale up to all, then it would have seen what buyers were willing to pay on the open market which is ultimately the determinant of what a property is worth. But that didn’t happen according to the Examiner. A 450-acre land-bank might have been of interest to buyers from Belfast to Belmullet, from Boston to Berlin but NAMA washes its hands of the matter saying it “was a matter for the professionals retained”. Is there a property owner in this country that would leave the sale of their property 100% in the hands of estate agents? Yes there is and it is NAMA.
In life do you have a natural bent to be optimistic and positive or do you have the bent toward the pessimistic and negative? Why do you think this is?
~Add rick rack, ribbon or lace (thanks for this one, Laura)
“I want to start tonight’s set with that wicked version of Slither, Sadie and I came up with. It’ll build tension, then we’ll explode on the crowd after a minute or so.”
I think there's something in the attic.
On to today's swatches.
1c coconut sugar
If this is as good as it gets, and I am still waiting for some enigmatic event to happen to make me happy, does that mean I will never be happy?
2. (re website) “there are just too many steps for the uninitiated…”
La Gelatiera is a hidden gem here in London, which considering it’s in the heart of Covent Garden, really should have tourists queuing out of the doors for hours for the delights inside. I’ve introduced many people to it, but I could definitely take more people along with me. La Gelatiera makes the most gorgeous gelato I think I’ve ever tasted, and with such varied flavours – Balsamic Vinegar for one is beautifully creamy with only the slightest bite of balsamic after taste – it is an odd, but entirely pleasurable experience. The other week they had bitter/ale flavoured gelato, which tasted exactly like you would expect, it even had a slight fizziness to it and how they managed to capture that I don’t know. My current favourite is their Kiwi gelato. It is like a cross breed between ice cream and sorbet as it has the freshness of a sorbet, but with the creaminess of gelato, also Kiwi is one of my favourite fruits, so managing to get it in to such a delightful mix pleases me greatly.
Function-Gate = 4XZZ (9FRE) = KIJA (YETAK + UTAK)
Hence, their relationship starts.
Plus these babies are made with some pretty simple ingredients with lots of health benefits. If you are looking for a way to add more love to your life with raw honey and coconut oil, you may just need to make this recipe today! Raw honey is a great food to eat in the spring to help clear your sinuses and mucus glands. But you must buy local raw honey to really reap the benefits for your own regions seasonal allergens. Here is a great resource about raw honey as well! And here is a great reason to try and add more pure organic coconut oil to your life as well. (See, I told you I could justify any healthy treat!) And you are gunna need it after you try one of these....you just can't stop after one!
The Morris arguments were not entirely ineffective -- he saw his vote percentages rise from 22.2% that first year to 53.5% last season (his 12th on the ballot). But Blyleven's percentages climbed appreciably faster. By Blyleven's 12th year, he was at 62.7% and seemed just about ready to get the necessary 75% for induction. The very next year he was at 74.2% -- just a handful of votes away from induction. Last year, his 14th on the ballot, he was voted in at almost 80%.
So I'm a little gun-shy, but...
There was also Just So Scrappy that I LOVED the kits. But they weren't free. I've been looking here and there for free kits I like but can't seem to find any. So when Just So Scrappy announced their Black Friday Sale, I knew I'd be getting my elements this weekend. For a long time I wanted the Happy Day kit, but then I really started looking at all the kits and what the elements in the kits were, and I thought Tweet Tweet would be much more usable. More elements that I would see myself using: cute little birds, bird houses, leaves, flowers, butterflies, ribbons, clouds, sun, picket fence!, grass. Not to mention 42 backgrounds.
the streamers hanging, the marshmallows on the left of the table, the pom pom hanging,
In 2008 he formed a partnership with German entrepreneur Immo Stroeher, who helped provide the funds to make this idea possible.
In order to make a major triad you will play the 1st + 3rd + 5th notes of a major scale.
CDIAC (Carbon Dioxide Information and Analysis Center)
Tel : 01 43 35 38 54
Please spend a lot of money here; while the economy here isn't as bad as most other places, we could still use it. We have incredibly fine and cheap Mexican food, and most of us are happy to point out the local favorites. (I, myself, had to have a come-to-Jesus conversation with some young French psychedelic country musicians the other night, who were extolling the virtues of the fabulous Mexican dinner they had just had at...BABY ACAPULCO'S. "Friends from across the pond," says I, "please let me direct you to Juan in a Million. And Taqueria Arandas. Joe's Bakery, Cisco's, and even Nuevo Leon. And that's just for breakfast.")
Back to the subject of Spring…for most gardeners (at least those of us in the north) we come alive at this time of the year. The lengthening days and warming soil is our call to action…so many things to see and do, no time to be wasted. I started to wonder how many gardeners would claim this as their favorite season. I’m always surprised when I hear gardeners say Fall is their favorite, if it were followed directly by Spring then I wouldn’t mind it, it’s just the fact that Winter comes next that I can’t get over. Summer though; Summer is what it’s all about for me…doors and windows open, warm evenings, the garden at its happiest. Of course if I lived in Austin, TX, I'm sure I would feel different.
Then I cut the open butterlfy and both glued together.
poppy seed dressing
approx 200ml of water
The Ugly: Produce chemicals that discourage natives from growing. Can increase the risk of wildfires in chaparral areas.
of the audience, there is
As usual, what you get from Kelley is a novel that is well written with clearly defined characters that the reader can associate with as well as love, carefully constructed dialogue and of course a plot that keeps you guessing from start to finish. Each novel is usually self-contained so that those unfamiliar can pick up wherever they wish and link to other titles in the series through the myriad of supernatural main characters who aid each other dependent upon the mission.
Martin Scorcese, Hugo
Examples: cloth diapers, waterproof diaper covers, bottle warmers, slings, playpens, breast pumps, etc.
‘Your rejection letter from the BBC. The one that said you’re not even in the top 10% of people sending them scripts. The one that said they didn’t read past the first ten pages. The one that said you’re about as funny as linoleum...’
As I was driving home, I thought about my own two 18-year olds, and the obscene amount of stuff they have, as well as the ridiculousness of expecting children that age to fend for themselves. Obviously, the state of Georgia agrees, because they’ve instituted an Independent Living Program to help foster kids aged 16-21 to find jobs, apply and get financial aid to college or tech schools, and learn housekeeping & financial literacy skills (which believe me, my kids could use as well.) In fact, if kids will sign back into the system at age 18, there are a host of services they can access: Medicaid, college tuition and living allowances. This year, the Department of Human Services is expending a lot of effort to strengthen the program even more and extend services to foster kids ages 18-21. Clearly, somebody at DFCS was looking out for Aaron when they called Kimberly to help – and that’s great news.
Situation 2: Girl meets boy. Boy says he likes girl. Girl thinks she might give him a chance. Boy sends obscene photo and expects girl to swoon over it. Girl stays single. Boy is stupid.
I am sad to see the zoo has dwindled to such a state, but I am planning to rebuild with the money I make over the next few months. It is all for the new Buggy Zoo- I call it Zen Critter.
"It's a little airplane that I can fly a little bit high."
Tidus J: when did you know you were a nerd?
of sacred poetry spanning
Now I graduate to an 800-square-foot former art room in a neighborhood school. That's a long way from a desk in a corner.
Love every second of your life to those who have filled your moments of life with sunshine and rain. Happiness or pain. Sadness or cheer for we must hold on to them without fear. Don’t wait to long to love them with all you got because one day they will be gone and you can’t get them back!
A poem is more like a plankton than like a vigilante. Whoever thinks of plankton as particularly active? But did you know that within the plankton are the seeds of the clouds?
Alcohol Consumption
Not that it matters what such minorities think. Three points is all that is required tonight and a deflected goal in the last minute will achieve that as much as a low swerving shot from the edge of the area.
Marie Bell Un Carnet de Bal
5. Chocolate Torte
Maybe that button (Add New Theme, or Installe New Theme) is moved somewhere else… If anybody can point where it is now – please comment.
It's amazing that human relations can determine sometimes what we eat, how we vote and how we educate our children. Such a statement, said or written so coldly, would probably provoke a stern response from those of us who believe we have the mental and physical capacity to make decisions about our diet, our political choices and our offspring. But scratch the surface and look closer and you'll occasionally find a complicated microcosm of self-doubts and nagging self-interrogation. Influenced in no small measure by the "herd mentality". Which is one of the reasons why we're fallible and make mistakes. And why some of those gaffes end up on Facebook twenty years later. And yet, there's still a certain beauty in it.
Took all my disease,
When she returned home, she worked with SNCC (Student Nonviolent Coordinating Committee) and became involved in SNCC’s International Affairs Commission. Other influences included meetings with women at the United Nations representing African liberation and anti-colonial struggles. When the Moynihan Report was published (1965) positing that the main problem afflicting the Black community was the Black matriarchy – a view that tried to push Black women into a second class role – Beal became a founding member of the SNCC Black Women’s Liberation Committee (1968), which evolved into the TWWA (Third World Women’s Alliance (1970-1978).
I think it was Oliver Brown who said that there are two types of Scot, those lucky enough to be born here and those intelligent enough to move here, and that seems to fit what can be seen in the towns and cities of Scotland day and daily. Those who have chosen to make this country their home sit easily in the values that Scotland shares, the investment they make in this nation shows the commitment they have whether they have just stepped across the border from England or flown in from Poland or Pakistan or India or Africa or, indeed, anywhere else in the world. Their values chime with those we recognise most happily in ourselves and that we, in our commonality, appear to share; perhaps not universally but in clear majority terms. They have a shared existence, a shared belief, a desire to share in the ‘large-scale solidarity’ that is Scotland and their lives are led to the same rhythm as ours. I find a greater affinity with someone who has chosen to come here than with those who have always had their allegiance tagged to another nation.
Children who are bullied experience real suffering that can interfere with their social and emotional development, as well as their school performance. Some victims of bullying have even attempted suicide rather than continue to endure such harassment and punishment. Children and adolescents who bully thrive on controlling or dominating others. They have often been the victims of physical abuse or bullying themselves. Bullies may also be depressed, angry or upset about events at school or at home.
By means of films of time-travel and amnesia, as well as films with similar temporal structures composed of loops and other figures beyond the straight line, we have staged what it feels like to live in our postmodern age. Seeing our uncanny double stealing our memories speaks to us more vividly, in the age of Facebook, than a cowboy shooting a bad-guy on a dusty plain. We need twisted plots in which we meet our own clones, and our clones are more real than we are, and then these clones produce clones which turn out to be amnesiacs. In a hall of mirrors, which Deleuze calls the crystal-image, before and after becomes relative, and time ceases to be linear, but is more like a knot, gem, or four dimensional sculpture.
I asked you last night
This person doesn't know me very well, so won't have been smirking to himself imagining the shuddering, gibbering wreck his email turned me into. It was an honest, genuine mistake. In a professional email. It wasn't a joke. And besides, it didn't just go to me - it went company-wide.
This all seems like a huge digression from my story, but nothing happens by chance you see, so it will all come together, if I have the time. Time: that's one of the disadvantages of living in space-time and having to use sensory-intellectual consciousness and those slippery little
Have you had a moment where it didn’t turn out like you thought? Comment and tell me about it!
Jeremiah 29:11 For I know the plans I have for you,” declares the LORD, “plans to prosper you and not to harm you, plans to give you hope and a future.
Some of the other rooms included a doctors office with a real (but old) dental chair, a bunch of X-rays, and some microscopes. Literally "stuffed" in the closet was "Stuffee", a 7 foot man who unzips to spill out his various cotton organs. There was also a small kitchen and shopping area, and two different arts and crafts areas that used recycled materials to provide the children a fun way to do projects while saving the environment.
Better than a Hallelujah sometimes.
It always makes me smile when I see them, and the sky was so pretty just at that moment.
Up Against The Wall
I have to say that I am pretty pleased with my results from last weekend’s SD Triathlon Classic. I still have not started a structured training program after Ironman and have only been in the pool a few times. What have I been up to? Well I have become hooked on Surfing and Stand Up Paddling. I have made a point to go every day I can after work (as long as I get in some sort of exercise before of course). Surfing has really been a blast I am getting better with each session and it’s a really fun relaxing workout. SUP has been another amazing escape from the everyday. I am participating in my first ever SUP race this Saturday which should be a blast.
I've already got some great support from friends. I have friends who have done WW before and are doing it again. I've got friends who have support groups on Facebook that they have invited me to be part of.
Elmasry accuses the Jews of ethnic cleansing, of apartheid and of being the instigators behind the invasion of Iraq. One of the site's specialties is rooting out the Jewish "cabal" that runs the Canadian government.
Yoni Avital broke that ice though. I felt transported to a different world altogether, as put his lips to the flute. Intense. The very vibes of the auditorium changed. He also later played ‘Eli Eli’ on the guitar. Here is Eli Eli, though in a female voice. It is a quintessential Hebrew song.
and the transfer from videotape to DVD wasn’t the clearest.
I picked up some new goodies over the weekend, the most exciting of which is the Southern Ice Porcelain Clay. It is just so nice to handle. It was only packed a couple of days ago so it’s very fresh and soft.
2And I saw another angel ascending from the east, having the seal of the living God: and he cried with a loud voice to the four angels, to whom it was given to hurt the earth and the sea,
The first thing we hear right out the gate is the music of Norbert Verrone, a man who clearly knows a thing or two about programming a drum machine (I liked how his drum machine sounded ethnic at times, if you know what I mean). But if that wasn't enough, Golden Temple Amazons provides moving pictures to go along with the film's audio output. Yeah, that's right. The film utilizes the visual and the audio end of the sensory spectrum simultaneously. Now, you would think, judging by my description, that Golden Temple Amazons contains all the necessary properties that go into making a well-rounded piece of filmed entertainment. Frankly, that's not the case at all. In fact, to call Golden Temple Amazons merely a "film" is an insult to cinema. No, what we're dealing with here is a life-affirming work of staggering artistic importance, and anyone who tries to tell you otherwise, ain't hooked up right.
Figuring out a relatively healthy and FREE! snack to take to baseball this week (oh, the pressure of being snack mom): Blackberry lemonade slushies. We'll be juicing lemons for the next few days, mixing the juice with a few jars of the blackberry syrup I canned last summer, and freezing it in pint sized canning jars.
Lotta food, right? And yet, pretty reasonably priced -- not wallet emptying! It was pretty much all delicious -- the Mexican roll was probably the most out-of-the-ordinary and had great flavors, but even the California roll managed to be special. The white tuna completely melted in my mouth, and the snapper tasted like... the ocean. Not "fishy," just fresh and with a subtle but distinct taste.
I’m not going into details on how the misbehavior really started but Work Friend A was already having a semi-heated argument with the expat while, at the same time, I was busy answering the other foreigner’s questions about some local expressions that he had apparently learned from some bar girls and so, in all politeness, I told him that he might not want to use those expressions as they were all indecent. He seemed to take pleasure in uttering those words, obviously. Ugh.
Take Shelter
E@L
“Only thing worse than watching a bad movie is being in one.”
Clair and (Please) Lose Yourself In Me have a noisy feel and would eventually lead to the sound that is in You Made Me Realise.
This was because Husband had decided to do some ironing and always fills up the water bit to the very top which means he blows the electricity Every Bloody Time He Irons. Almost. Am very slightly Exaggerating here but needs must and all that.
My question of the day is this though: I’ve chosen not to be in a relationship because I don’t want to deal with someone else’s crap, basically. BUT…don’t they have to take on mine in some respect?! I’m not perfect…close…but not quite haha I think my problem is that it’s always been me taking all of the crap and putting in all/most of the effort…and it wasn’t just in my head – both my friends/family and his friends/family said the same thing. So it’s not a biased opinion. If your own mother agrees with me that you’re being a jerk…or your best friend…clearly I’m not in the wrong here.
After watching that for the first time (trust me…I’ve watched it many times now), I feel like reaching out, hugging the actors, taking them away from the horribleness that is Osombie and then punching them in the shoulder blade while telling them to get themselves educated, and to go get a real job (like doing commercials for Yoplait or teaching Tai Chi…something worthwhile like that).
K: Are there places or people that you have in mind?
I’d like to share pics of their decor from last year. Their condo is decorated with serene, neutral colors, which are a great backdrop for both natural-looking and bright, fun Easter decor. I loved seeing hot pink and lime scattered in there for the holiday.
August 25
If there’s one scene that I will leave you with, it has to be this one. Slavik has captured the general who was publicly executing him and he is now publicly executing him because we don’t learn our lessons well in evil cults. This video is the single best reason to ever play this game. Just in case you can’t though:
Think of how the passage of time changes our views on things. Something that was paramount to you in your 20s may seem trivial to you in your 50s. And then again, the opposite also happens. Things that you didn’t give time to when you were young seem the most important to you as you age.
I do not know what I expected – that she would live forever? - that her current life was a fact to read about and as a fact would stay that way? – that she was a living mentor for me? I do not know how some one can feel grief for someone they have only read about.
And wait and wait and wait.
If I squint my eyes I can barely make out a turn up ahead. If I could just jump in and ride, I'd be OK. It's the rocking back and forth with indecision and non-action that haunts me.
Firstly, I was really irritated by the language and style. There were, strewn very haphazardly, such infantile words straight from teenage “slang” like craptacular, etc.. Happened maybe 4-5 times and pulled me straight out of the book, because none of the people had that age, and the terms were without good effect either. Really enervating was the “queer/queeny” talk between the two men who at times sounded either like two tattling teenager girls (!) or like two old female cronies, but not like men and if anyone called me ookie-snookums etc. as often as these people called themselves totally idiotic endearments (practically once every sentence) I’d pull a machine gun at one point and let rip, just to shut this up…
After I left college and found myself in the world of work, the same pattern repeated. Having ended up in retail I was rarely out of the shop before 6 and always then had a significant journey home to face. In fact I'm not sure now how I managed the two years I spent working in Newmarket - a 110 mile round trip every day from Felixstowe, having to be there for 8 and not getting home until at least 7 most nights. Even when I moved to the Council and got into flexi-time I was still rarely home before 6 - often due to picking MrsB up from work (she is still in the business of selling things) but more likely just because of getting the required number of hours in per day after starting at around 9.
What is so special about Shimla? PlanTripForMe is not going to give you one reason because how can there be just ONE reason when we are talking about Shimla?
In this heartfelt true story, an unexpected encounter leads to an inseparable alliance between two women who come to believe their chance meeting was not happenstance, but destiny. This friendship is sure to last the ages, until a devastating turn of events shatters their dream and alters the course of their lives. Through one another, they grow in ways neither expected nor dreamed. What each believed to be weakness becomes strength. Fear becomes courage. How their relationship deepens as they face the ultimate challenge resonates long after the last page is read. In the end, one simple, yet profound lesson is learned . . . Love best what matters most: Family, Friends, and God's Grace To Carry
So he could hardly have been clearer there that it was not government per se that he opposed but rather the type of government -- tyrannical government versus government that was respectful of the individual. Who could deny the importance of such a difference? Another quote:
it is only an 8 week block. Ashley will have to sit out at least 8 weeks before starting again. Ashley will spend more time out of therapy then in therapy in the next year. Image if she regresses and doesn't have that opportunity to learn how to walk independently. Ontario has amazing therapists who are forced to work privately and many families can't afford this cost. Please don't let these children down. It's an uphill battle just to be a kid.
It said in many of the cases, the deceased had been brutally assaulted by officials with batons, electric shields and booted feet. The official had then failed to provide “adequate and timeous” medical attention.
ssshh . . . don't tell our friends at tutti frutti! ;)
With this first professorial appointment based in its School of History, Art History and Philosophy, the University of Sussex is developing its research base in modern Middle Eastern history.
Still and all, this is a highly enjoyable outing from a fine musician, and the sound is good.
"Alright lads and lassies?"
The next time I go grocery shopping, I'm wearing high heels and sunglasses!
1 tablespoon of unsalted butter
It's Girl Scout Cookie time! It is also the 100th anniversary of Girl Scouts. I have three Girl Scouts who are working hard to sell cookies to get to summer camp this year. We have a huge goal (1000 boxes of cookies) and we are already a quarter of the way there! So, needless to say, I have to buy several from each of my girls. As my Grandma Lewis would say, "If you kick one, you have to kick them all." I have been doing a lot of kicking...lol.
I FINISH: far less of them than I should
I first showed signs of anorexia when I was a sophomore in high school. I began limiting food. I was a synchronized swimmer and wanted to lose weight to look better in a bathing suit. Rather than eating lunch, I’d study or talk to friends. I stayed late at school and skipped dinner. I exercised compulsively, sometimes working out all night. I didn’t want to sleep, because I wouldn’t be burning any calories. Keeping up the self-starvation became more difficult when I started going to Sweet 16 parties. I’d eat a salad or soup, a binge for me at that time. To compensate, I began purging and taking pills—laxatives, diet pills, water pills—25 or 30 a day. I lost weight. I always felt cold and often lightheaded. I fainted. I was very moody and temperamental. Toward the end, I developed fine baby hair on my tummy (a symptom of anorexia). The enamel on my teeth eroded from the stomach acid coming back up when I vomited. I needed many fillings.
Or “too serious”
The others may prove a little tougher if you are somewhat rusty on your cinema history. Laura is relatively easy as is Love Is a Many-Splendored Thing-if you remember their title is that of the movie. Who can forget Gene Tierney in the former and Jennifer Jones and William Holden in the latter.
Until next time!!
There is now, by luck, fate or by design enough money coming my way to allow me to try and arrange surgery sometime this year. I have a timescale now of a year to change the physical attribute I was mistakenly given in my mothers’ womb. Firstly I have to be in ‘role’. Being in ‘role’ means proving to a male doctor that you are a woman, their idea of a woman. It is not enough to turn up looking comfortable and at ease, you should be all accounts arrive at your intended doctors office looking like an over made stripper; make up, hair extensions, tight fitting clothes and stripper heels, the complete sexual fantasy. Tap ‘transgender’ into the internet and you will be taken to a million porn sites featuring Brazilian ‘she males’ that earn a living having fake breasts and real working penises. Strangely it is their model I have to follow, beauty, beauty and more beauty. Breasts please and large ones I need double D’s. I sat next to Ulrika Johnson a couple of days ago in a Lebanese café and I love the way she looks, dresses. She is so unlike a Brazilian ‘she male’. I will have to model myself on her for the doctors. She is on Big Brother so I can take notes. How odd that again I have to dress to impress a man. I shouldn’t blow it out of proportion it is just one of many hurdles this next year will throw up. Writing today is odd, stilted, exciting then flat, impossible then easy. Maybe I am looking too far inwards, maybe I need to look out, to the media, to politics, the arts, culture. Maybe this is just a very healthy block. Maybe I have nothing to say right now. I look tired, black eyes from anxious nights of worry. Sleep may be easier now I know I have the money to finance this year. I make a promise to myself that over this year I will look after me.
Let me ask you – Have you ever fasted – why or why not? If you have fasted, have you ever had a spiritual breakthrough as a result of fasting? What comes to your mind when you think of fasting?
Sponsored by the Alumni Association, the Monty Award is a symbol of achievement and success presented to distinguished alumni from each of SDSU’s seven academic colleges, Imperial Valley Campus and Library and Information Access. Distinguished service awards also are given to an exceptional alumni volunteer and an outstanding university employee.
“We got our fingers burnt so badly,” he said lifting her hand and lacing their fingers together. Her other hand touched his face making him return his gaze to hers.
Today I was watching the episode of HIMYM where Marshall fires Randy Wharmpess. Randy was a disaster in the big corporate office and as much as Marshall didn’t want to hurt Randy, he finally fired him. Marshall had nightmares of Randy being suicidal with the news when in fact, Randy wasn’t hurt at all. He was ecstatic and blessed that he was fired! Finally, Marshall forced him free from his job that he hated, allowing him to follow his dreams of selling his Wharmpess Beer. Marshall thought he was ending Randy’s life when really he was empowering him to finally start it. When Marshall sacrificed himself to ‘benefit’ Randy by ‘un-firing’ him, they both ended up unhappy. Marshall still had an incompetent assistant and Randy was back at his hated job, not courageous enough to quit for his beer. In the end, Marshall benefits from re-firing him because then he can hire someone who can love the job and be helpful to him while Randy benefits because he now is forced to live his dream and sell Wharmpess.
i wouldn't say he was ever camera-shy. it was more like "camera-annoyed."
Fourth Quarter: NHL
The handwritten text is a rule-- I almost always do it, and I can't escape my thoughts. One key to understanding the text is that it's usually like you said, Amy, it's like a family album-- it tells us why a picture was taken at that exact moment, it tells what was thought to be the story's end at that moment or other key fact that was in our minds when I came to make a picture.
years of education more effective and disrupts family life much less),
Out of a blue sky three weeks ago, Chelyabinsk appended himself to one of my Telegraph threads and – referring to me as The Slug – made some passing swipe about me being “a promoter of superficial conspiracy theories”. I’m relaxed about being thought superficial, because deep down I am; but ‘conspiracy theorist’ is rapidly turning into the new ‘extreme Right blogger’ as the slur of choice among the Establishment.
One thing I did on this trip was confront my fear or heights. I have issues with step ladders, so taking a seat in a cable car and ascending to the mountain range of Grindelwald-First, was quite a feat! The scenes were breathtaking, you could hear Swiss cows with their neck bells clanging in the distance, lots of exclamations of ‘WOW’ from my friends and I, so the journey was actually quite calming and pleasant.
It's can't be real. It is the cold and flu meds and all a figment of my medicated imagination.
Public outrage over the death of a 13-year-old girl shoves him into the spotlight as one of the best investigators in the country. When he uncovers the girl's secret life--a prostitute catering to pedophiles through the internet--he finds the public attitude changes quickly. When all clues point towards the largest television ministry on the East Coast the change becomes dramatic. The fear of what secrets might be uncovered within the flock spurs religious leaders and several high-ranking politicians to obstruct his investigation.
adopted by the state of Arizona. Immigration policies definitely need
Publisher: Houghton Mifflin Harcourt, 2003
a) Honourable Tag: “Chop Zuey Girl”
My Biggest Boy A turns 5 this week. He also starts at 2 different schools (preschool and early intervention for speech). There is also the family birthday party, and his friends birthday party on Saturday.
JS - It’s not consistent with the First Division. Dundee got 25 points…
At the time I was recovering from a chest infection, and suffering from lack of sleep brought on by having an eight-week-old baby yelling all over the shop, so I have no idea if I made any sense at all. If you've listened to it and I didn't, why not shout at me about it in the comments section?
Mirrors are not pretty because they reflect reality. They show us (for good or bad) how we are progressing toward a goal. But very often they reflect the mindset of the person looking into the glass. Personal growth is difficult to see unless we have people act as our mirrors. We need them to help us see how we’ve developed or not. But we can also be the mirror for others. They can learn what they have meant to us and how they’ve affected our life. That is a great way to see progress. That is a real mirror.
Emma...Sophie Vavasseur
I was, as I’m sure were many of Jordan’s fans, pleased to hear that they had selected a replacement author to finish his books, one Brandon Sanderson. Quickly upon this revelation I searched my local library catalogue for some of his books, finding then checking out the first book in his Mistborn trilogy (and why do fantasy authors always write trilogies? Oh, wait—so that they don’t write fourteen-ologies). I read it with pleasure. Here, perhaps, was an author who could capably finish Jordan’s masterwork.
As you might be able to imagine, the flat decals did not apply to the round surface easily.
Kyoto is surrounded by snow-capped mountains that remind me of LA. Gion is the small district where geisha live and we were able to spot a few while walking around during dusk. It's hard to believe that most likely in another generation, the art form will be extinct (there are only a few thousand geisha left in Japan compared to over 80,000 post WWII). We took walks and runs around the various temples and shrines and explore a flea market full of Japanese goods and food.
I hate her and her stupid lips and the fact she dances with Makism and SUCKS and EVERYONE KEEPS VOTING FOR HER, WHY?!
Unless students feel emotionally comfortable with the teacher, they will not learn in a sustained fashion; they will only acquire information expediently and transiently. They must be reminded by the strategically self-conscious teacher about the ongoing narrative/through-line of the course, where they are located within it, and how the course will eventually pertain to their lives in the day to day larger society.
I can’t remember where I read this article, but I “borrowed” and slimmed down the ways to know you’re ready for a relationship and added my own twist to them, no sense in recreating the wheel!
Streamer fishing can be on and off at this time of the year, always worth working the shorlines for those big Browns, you never know.
Louise is loving the digital camera she got in Canberra and keeps rushing up to show me her new shots around the house and garden – I think she’s going for the whole ‘beauty in the everyday’ thing rather than the ‘document every square meter of our holiday’ agenda that some people I know have. Not mentioning any names.
9 min: As Ramires receives treatment following a clash with Tioté, the camera pans to Roman Abramovich, who is spoting a comfy-looking Chelsea coat. It’s a good deal Chelsea offer: buy the club and invest over half a billion pounds, and they’ll throw in a free coat.
First off, Fashion Footing had a giveaway on her Facebook page for the Burt’s Bees güd lotion in Orange Petalooza. It smells so citrusy and fresh, it reminds me of fresh orange juice and it leaves my skin so hydrated and smooth! Here’s a tip on applying lotion to your hands: put a small dollop on the back of your hand, rub the backs of your hands together to distribute the lotion, and when it’s almost completely absorbed then you can use the palms to rub it in the rest of the way. No more greasy lotion hands! Funny enough I actually got a sample of güd in the mail the same day that I’d ordered from Burt’s Bees in Floral Cherrynova. I can hardly decide which scent I like more!
Back to time....it is so fleeting these days. I'm working more hours than I have in a long time on top of my class schedule. And yet, I am making less than I did last year. But I keep put on that uniform and trying to make it work. Then there is the chauffeur aspect of my life. Each kid is completely immersed in activities, and I need a spreadsheet to keep up!! Ana made the travel softball team, and is in soccer. Practices and games seem to happen almost every day. If I had one child that would be great. But then there is Bella. She has taken to Jr. High like a fish to water. She shook off her disappointment of not making the school's softball team, and starting joining. She joined the speech team (which isn't really speech if you ask me. It was called Literary when I was in school). Being in band, she is now in concert band, mixed choir, and Show choir. Ah....she also tried out and MADE the school basketball team!! I am super proud of her, but she has practice for something everyday. Sometimes before school at 7. Sometimes after school....and can be there as late as 7. Pile on the homework, and she is as busy as I am.
Happily, the gallows which used to be in the square have been removed. The jousting competitions might have been fun to watch. Perhaps they could be brought back.
Extra life?
Rowley’s Authentic San Diego Advocaat
We both have a good laugh at the incorporation of a character such as, poacher Sam Seeley. Katie rightly questions how oddly clean his clothes are. He's a poacher and he's wearing brand new clothes. We both have a good laugh spotting the Facsimile extras moving when they're not supposed to in the Madame Tussaud's section. Naughty extras!
"YOU!!", I'll say placing my hand on their forehead... "NINE point SEVEN. I hope you like your steak with saliva sauce and a hint of cigarette."
BARRY GRAY – JOAN GRAY’S SHOP GUERNSEY
us.. If we only would take that
Glass domes, pill dispensers and Jambox speakers are arrayed along a cutout of the San Francisco coast in photographer Frank Hülsbömer’s still-life constructions pay homage to the influence of his ideas in the more mundane areas of life.
Divine Nature
It’s these scenes in the middle where Hill is at her most interesting, as her disapproving glance at Stark says more about her than all that running and driving and shooting in the action sequence because it could be anyone running, driving, and shooting, but here on the Helicarrier, it can only be Maria Hill.
UPDATE: I just have no words. This guy. Um. How old is he, anyway? He writes like a teenager who’s practiced auto-erotic asphyxiation too many times. Anyway, he’s a defense contractor who thinks taxes are MEAN. His entry and his commenters provide a lavish buffet of stupidity. Most of the comments consist of “JUST CUT______!” Oh jesus. There are a couple of commenters who’ve tried to let some oxygen into their stinky, smelling- of-kinky-sex-and-Hot-Pockets echo chamber, but they’re outnumbered.
7. As far as you are able, avoid all occasions of wrath and quarreling, about the matters of your families.(22)
...that it thinks "OS 10" refers to its age.
12. 3 row window seat left side
Vespa DolcevitaThe Vespa Dolcevita is based on the shapely design of the original model of the 1950′s, with a styling reference to the "Corsa" racing versions, where the seat was positioned on the edge of the rear section, which integrates the engine compartment.
Before the march turned violent, some of the demonstrators acknowledged that Putin’s March election win was a blow to morale.
Today we will think about something else in this encounter between Elijah and God and that is; sometimes we must take care of physical needs before a spiritual encounter with God. Elijah had wandered into the desert; he needed rest, food, and water. God sent a messenger, or an angel, to bake a cake and to provide water and then instructed Elijah to, “Rise and eat.” Then the angel told him to eat again because the journey was going to be difficult.
Some info from
Their softness a blight
May his way. “FORWARD!” Be out the door to return no more. Then may the United States returned to its roots as a nation of laws under the United States Constitution and Declaration of Independence.
1 AM Lasagna!
John and I were staying about 15 minutes away from Heerenveen, in a little hotel in the middle of some farmland (technically in Steenwijk). The night before, we’d come in tired, and looked around just long enough to admire the rustic wooden floors and to be grateful for the sparkling clean bathroom and crisp linens and soft bathrobes …
Here are a few ideas that I was thinking of trying:
The images were watercoloured with some watercolour pencils, cut out and adhered to some plain white cardstock that I embossed with a Cuttlebug folder. Minus the watercolouring and cutting out of the images, the card was done in 3 minutes or less---yeah!
Wisdom and understanding are not enough. It is not sufficient just to know right from wrong, it is also necessary to do it, and we must be careful to guard against the influence of the things that might turn us away from God.
My career has nothing to do with arts and crafts. Actually it is as far as you can get from it: I have a BA in English and work part time as an English/Russian/Ukrainian medical interpreter.
To make enchiladas. See my post here to read how I prepare corn tortillas for rolling in a way that cuts back on oil. Ladle enough sauce to cover a 9 x 13 baking dish. How much filling you want to use is up to you, I'd say about 1/4 cup. When you fill the dish (8-10 enchiladas), ladle the rest of the sauce over the enchiladas and garnish with some grated cheese if desired. Bake at 350 for about 15 minutes.
Not confirmed on the official website, The Guardian reports that scans showed ankle ligament damage. This ties in with Arsène’s comments post-Wigan that the injury was not a simple twist. It is a blow but not an unexpected one; at this stage of the season, it is one that the club could do without. His absence will mean a reshuffled pack in midfield, an early thought is that Aaron Ramsey would start but it is one complicated by Benayoun’s absence due to the Premier League ruling on loan players being ineligible to play against their parent club.
Now here is a swatche of Zoya Perrie.
Built in various stages through the nineteenth century, Jesmond Towers is a large Grade II listed gothic-looking building. It was bought by Charles Mitchell (shipbuilder) in 1869. Charles and his wife Anne, who he married in 1854, made the house their home. The lounge was home to many great paintings which were collected by their son who was great art enthusiast.
Halve tomatoes. Core, seed and quarter peppers. Arrange peppers and tomatoes skin side down on a rimmed baking sheet or roasting pan. Roast at 425 degrees for 45 minutes. Remove from oven and cool, reserving any pan juices. Press tomatoes and peppers through a food mill. Combine with reserved juices in a pitcher.
Hot Fog have been shredding around San Francisco for the past three years now and they have finally decided to grace us with their first official release. Recorded and engineered by drummer, Donny Newenhouse, Wyvern is a perfect blend of fancy NWOBHM and early thrash. Triumphant vocals, dueling guitars, and a powerhouse rhythm section make it perfect gamer metal. And these guys aren’t just blowing smoke (or fog) up your ass. The band actually plays D&D together. How cool is that?
Thank you to everyone who entered our 'Vintage' Challenge, there were so many stunning pieces of vintage work, it was a real joy to see such beautiful crafts. Choosing a Top 3 was extremely hard, but you'll have to wait to see who made our Top 3, winner and GD at the end of this challenge post.
“Do you want to talk or..?” So quiet, he has to strain to hear her, that little-girl lisp to her voice is almost endearing.
The time has passed for me to make this dirty diet my last.
Davy Jones and Illya Kuryakin (David McCallum...and NO 'Ducky' does not come to mind when we mention his name)....
I will be back as soon as possible and will in the meantime still be reading your blogs, just maybe not commenting as much as normal.
Blondie Daughter is in bits. She is worried that Rose's Mum is going to shout at her in the playground tomorrow and she has no idea what she has done wrong. I have assured her that won't happen. Between you and me, if Rose's Mum so much as raises her eyebrows at my daughter, she'll rue the bloody day.
Rinse the quinoa in cold water and drain. Put the quinoa in a large covered saucepan and add chicken stock. Bring to a boil. Reduce heat and simmer, covered, for 15 minutes. (No liquid should remain.)
In that same press release, Amazon stated that the average payout was 26% of what that particular book earned. Seven earned $549.60 on sales in December, so its payout was almost exactly 10%. This, of course, doesn't mean that the average isn't 26%, but it certainly wasn't in my case.
And then she disappears without a trace…
"You live and learn" they say, and true to that, this year's graduate school application process is far less stressful than the year before. I knew I should look into both PhD and Masters program again but since those three universities rejected me last year, I opted not to apply to them again. If they don't want you last year ... they probably still don't this year.
“Now I am in a relationship actually and I can see how much drastically healthier it is, how much happier I am,” said Sara Leonard.
3. Gently remove seedling from pot by peeling back (or popping out by gently overturning into your palm/fingers) surrounding container and then lift root ball and place in hole deep enough to cover the stem up to its first set of leaves as well as wide enough to comfortably fit the root mass…fill in around. I transplanted a number of flowers today – below is a morning glory and here on the left, are poppy’s.
I hope you all had a wonderful weekend, I am going to try to photo all my new pieces tomorrow and get them listed, so check the shop soon!
First pic was taken on the site where we stayed for the week.
Course of Conduct
Geography HG F
Since it is Friday it is time for another sketch challenge at Sketch Frenzy Friday. This week our sketch was created by Deb Currier. Deb is the queen of the C&S card. When I see her cards I always say "Wow". Her sketch is also a clean and simple one. Here is what I created using her sketch.
Those words, first spoken more that twenty one centuries ago have been quoted often during the ensuing millennia, and are repeated frequently by nationalists in our own time. We need not question their longevity, for they remain as relevant and as apt today as they did when Cicero spoke them in the first century BC. In fact they are words never more pertinent than today, for our modern society has so blurred the line between honour and betrayal, between truth and between lies that traitors can move more freely, can spread their poison more widely and can have a more devastating effect than at almost any previous time in our history.
8. “American Grotesque”: an essay on the 9/12 Tea Party protest march and the suicide of Bill Sparkman, former school teacher and Field Representative for the United Stated Census Bureau. A politically charged, thoughful essay that I think I’ll have to read a second, maybe a third time to appreciate and fully understand.
-Punk misses the high knee in the corner sending him to the outside. Ouchy!
Sounds ass-backwards, no?
“Not at all,” comes the reply as Mr Davison yanks open the window, sending Tom to his doom.
Did I mention with all the rushing out to buy tutus, I forgot to tuck a freshly charged battery in my camera? Sara helped out with her Droid and I received some photos from Amy as well.
Yuichi Arisu (Koichi Sato) is a salary man leading a bland existence with Chisato (Tae Kimura) his beautiful wife who finds him distant. His only joy is in the supernatural mystery novels of Jo Kuroda (Kazuyoshi Kushida) which are set in Darkland, a mysterious alternate universe. A series of coincidences turn Arisu’s life upside down; he meets a psychologically disturbed chap in rabbit costume named Mr. Trickster (Akira Emoto), Chisato disappears and, when he falls asleep on the underground, he finds himself in conversation with Kuroda who wants him to tell his story, a story of an affair with a beautiful and mysterious woman named Kayako (KIKI) which begins at the eponymous Starfish Hotel. As the story is revealed and he searches for Chisato, Arisu‘s reality, memories and nightmares begin to mix.
This is a really nice story about two little girls, one black, one white, who want to have their fathers in their lives again. It kept my interest for sure. Although somewhat predictable, it's a good story and well worth your time. It goes fast!
“Yeah,” I said suddenly feeling very depressed, “you’re the very first caller.”
Note the repetition. Aragorn repeats, “But it is not this day!” just as Jesus repeats, “Blessed are those…!” Jesus is marshaling his troops with a battle cry. The kingdom of God is near; indeed, it is “within you.” The Church’s primary task is to usher in this kingdom.
The Brooklyn Dodgers played their last game at Ebbets Field on Sept. 24, 1957. The next season, they were the Los Angeles Dodgers. But apparently as late as July 1956, flashy ideas for a new Brooklyn stadium were still being bandied about, at least according to this article from a 1956 Mechanix Illustrated magazine.
-Present the Liebster Blog Award to 5 blogs of 200 followers or less who you feel deserve to be noticed.
This week was kind of an easy to pick, because I have recently bought his new CD, Battle Studies, and EVERY SINGLE song on this album ROCKS!!! My Artist of the week is John Mayer!!! He writes his own music, plays one mean guitar and sings effortlessly!! His lyrics will get you "lost in the music" to say the least. He even has a duet with Taylor Swift on this album called Half of my Heart. One reason I chose John's CD this week, is it would be the PERFECT Valentine's Day gift for your "sweetie". Rich and I love listening to his music! Let me know if you decided to try out John's music and let me know what you think!
Tuesday 20 october 2009 22h45
Well today was a fine day. I woke up to a cold bedroom unrested from a bad nights rest of staying up to late surfing the internet and writing blog articles.
Bar Kohkba—“The Circle Maker”
4. A Little Bit More Conviction
As many faithful readers know by now, BookEnds strongly believes in paying it forward. For years now we have “hired” interns to work with us throughout the course of the year (and I use the term “hired” loosely since they work for nothing more than free books). One of the reasons I subscribe so strongly to the power of internships is because I truly believe it was the work I did outside of my college coursework that got me to where I am today. My first job offer had nothing to do with the journalism classes I took and everything to do with the many internships I had and the years I worked on the student paper.
Wendy & Lisa Waterfall US
If you're a well-coiffed blond society matron, saying what Ann Romney said makes you feisty. Michelle Obama wouldn't have that privilege.
Okay,I'll quit obsessing and just post this already. I've been working on it for 2 Whole. Days. Ugh! haha
of my affair —- days when you raged
The palate was lovely and clean with bright balanced acidity, richly textured, ripe, nectarine fruit. The oak is quite powerful and toasty, but well integrated and elegant at the same time.
For years people have been asking me why I don't put my books on Amazon.com and/or why I don't offer credit card purchases. Long story about the why... but the good news is, older dogs can learn new tricks, although not easily, mind you (LOL).
Vimmie Magsino and Ivan Labianca have been “in love” for approximately a year and a half. They first met in a class they had together and then spent time together in Jordan. While in Jordan Ivan asked Vimmie to have tea with him. They spent time together as friends for awhile and then eventually became a couple by proxy. Neither really ever think of their relationships as being “interracial.”
Week 3 – Wagner unleashes his Latino love machine in a Spice Girls / Ricky Martin mash-up rescinding the ‘no white after Labour Day’ rule and looking hot in dream catchers and a mesh wife beater. Phwoar!
We are introduced here to the new companion, Vicki. Played by Maureen O'Brien, Vicki seems to be regarded as a much more popular companion than Susan. I find that disappointing. Susan was a bit wet and she could be annoying, but I still liked her. She had a genuinely alien quality about her that fitted in well with her situation as the Doctor's granddaughter. I am not convinced by the way that Vicki becomes a sorty of surrogate granddaughter in place of Susan. I also don't like the way Maureen O'Brien played the part. Too often it seemed like she was not taking the role seriously and she often looked like she was about to start laughing. When her experiences as a child of the future are mentioned, they are played for laughs. It is all a bit too knowing.
Bitchfest- Lisa Jervis & Andi Zeisler
You know the importance. I don’t have to stress that, and I’ve never been one for speeches. Tomorrow is big enough by itself to get you motivated. There is nothing I can say or do to get you more mentally and spiritually ready for what you’re about to face. Instead, I simply want to reiterate what we’ve gone through. Not for your sake, gentlemen, but for my own. Because tomorrow you’ll go out and play your hearts out without a care in the world. I miss that. I’d give anything to be out there with you, fighting a common foe with my hands and my heart. No, tomorrow I’ll be on the sideline, and I’m the one who’ll need reminders about what needs to be done. By “sidelines” I mean special guest expert on Good Morning America, Oprah and the Colbert Report, but you know just as well as I do that they all mean the same thing anyway: I’m gonna be the guy who looks like he knows what he’s doing so other people can get the doing done. So I’m gonna remind myself right here in front of you, on the eve of battle, and you’re gonna listen and tell me what I’ve missed.
I then folded the fabric over, right sides together, worked out where to sew the pouch together, ensuring I didn't sew up my tunnel, and trimmed the excess fabric:
Perhaps predictably (and definitely appropriately) the most superlative element in director/producer/choreographer Rachel Klein’s new show by far is the dancing, staged by Klein with a real eye for stage-pictorials and a knack for keeping the audience’s blood thumping. Her cast is having a blast at these moments and by extension so are we.
So I sit here once again to give a voice to someone who felt that they had no right to a voice. Everyone has a right to a voice it is what you do with that voice and who you lift with that voice that counts.
When she applied to be included in our second anthology no one was in any doubt that she would be an asset. The ethos of the group, and in particular of the anthologies, is that everyone has to take an active part in every stage of the process. I remember the first time Emily read the chapter of Our Street at a public event. She kept her head lowered throughout and her voice was tiny. One of the things that was remarkable to us all over the next months was the amazing nature of her journey from that shy beginning. At event after event, the one thing you could depend on was that Emily would be there, volunteering to read and supporting others. Each time, her confidence increased until, the last time she read, it was with a strong voice and with eye contact maintained with the audience as she introduced them to her fictional world. She also took responsibility for organising events and, in this aspect too, she went from tentative beginnings to triumphant confidence, always challenging herself and pushing the boundaries beyond her natural comfort zone.
Rdio further enhances this feature with your home page. It shows the most played albums from your collection, or from the friends you follow, or from all of Rdio. I can’t emphasis enough the importance of this feature. Ever since the development of the Sony Walkman the evolution of music has been towards private listening. I wrote a post years ago called, “Why Has Listening to Music Become as Solitary as Masturbation?” The following other users counters that trend making music social again. Sadly, only Rdio has it, and its this feature more than anything that will make me pick Rdio in the end.
Uncertain that the tale’s renaissance would ever come, but not without all hope that it would, the author created a folder dubiously named the Possibly Salvageable Junk Pile. There she placed the numerous documents containing the mutilated fragments of the storyline, and there they would remain until such a time as the author felt ready to turn the heap of refuse into a book worthy of the story it would contain.
“Is that so bad?”
Air
Well, it wasn’t that I was grown up - it was just that I was interacting with them us I would with a friend. And through these relationships I was able to talk about things that were relevant to adults.I was able to have a lot of educational and relational experiences that other children didn’t seem to have access to.
Gibson
"You two just go on ahead," Ken said. "I'm gonna browse in the hardware store."
My father was in the 29th Evacuation Unit," I tell him.
With time, Kaleb came off the ventilator and CPAP and continued to show improvement. He had problems eating so he had to have additional surgery to have a bilateral inguinal hernia repaired and a feeding tube inserted to help him get the nutrition he needed.
Off to work. Game night tonight. Looking forward to it.
If there is anything in this little post that doesn't make sense, please let me know...it's late and it's been a long post...I am off to bed now...
One motive for farm murders is labour disputes. There is a dispute between employers and employees which escalates to the point where one party kills the other. The police sometimes point out that very often a murderer is someone known to the victim — a family member or an employee or employer. And this applies to farm murders as well.
As the minutes tick by and his coffee cup empties, he listens carefully for the sound of her voice calling his name and sniffs the breeze for a hint of her perfume. He would know her touch anywhere as there is nothing like the feel of her hand in his. If he tries hard enough he can imagine her phantom fingers caressing his skin. Though, he cannot see her face. The memory is no longer vivid and his eyes are a thing of the past.
2. Take a glass baking dish and place about half the sauce in the bottom and spread it uniformly.
This means lots of small ideas all over the place, rather than one big idea defining and representing all our messages. I've heard this idea repeated frequently by digital agencies and their representatives.
If your nasal passage just shut down in defence, merely at the thought, I am not surprised.
Daily Points Remaining: 9
You might have noticed I haven't been the most regular poster on this blog of late. As every artist who tries to self promote their art knows, when you have your own business (and let's just say I have more than one to run) you're responsible for so many (too many!) details. And the devil is in the details. But I'm feeling on top of it all once again. The decision to let go of trying to be found on Etsy is contributing to my peace of mind.
It took me a few times on stage to really be able to answer this question honestly. In the beginning, I just wanted to prove to myself that I could do it. I wasn’t thinking about magazines, or sponsorships or prize money (mainly because I didn’t know about any of that), I only wanted to develop self-discipline with the bi-product of a great physique and to look like I belonged on stage. But after competing, I was introduced to the vast array of opportunities for fitness modelling, acting, hosting, writing, coaching, etc. However, I knew that stepping on stage would not always lead to those opportunities, what really leads to “making it” in the fitness world is persistence (the hustle!), a great look, a personality to match and a lot of hard work. Winning has little to no bearing on receiving those opportunities, again, it comes from attitude and the work you are willing to put it.
But after researching this wine for this blog post, I discovered its amazing story and that got me thinking about its journey from the grape fields of southeastern Australia to the store shelf where I found it.
However, you people are probably used to my awesome photography by now. I bet you wouldn't know what to do if I started posting "actual" photographs that I edited or something.
** Of course not! It’s just changing.
You have to see the opportunities and make them happen. You have to see your dreams become a reality. You have to seize your goals.
In a bowl, beat the egg with sugar, oil and salt; until well combined. Add in flour, baking powder and 1/2 C milk. Stir well, trying to get all lumps out and adding more milk, if too thick. Fold in chocolate chips and pretzels.
"You're making up stuff, right?"
Carter's ability to dictate the direction of the band through both rhythmic and harmonic means is unparalleled by any other bassist. Harmonically he seems to have a lexicon of possibilities to apply to even the most mundane tunes, and pieces that he must have played thousands of times. To hear Ron Carter play a blues is to hear the apogee of endless variation of a simple harmonic form. If you are an aspiring bassist and you want to learn how to play great walking bass lines on a blues or Rhythm Changes, just take virtually any RC recording and transcribe what he plays - everything you need is there.
And, Malynda just called-we made the front page of the Tamworth paper
Not falling for any fake pregnancy announcements on April Fool's Day (I totally did last year).
(gotta watch her though - got a heavy foot on the pedal!)
I mean, how on earth could I resist?
Ticks on a different beat
Next, they're taking on Medicaid at the state level through the Republican governors like 2012 presidential candidate, Rick Perry, who signed into a law a piece of personal morality-laden trash requiring all women who opt for an abortion to first have a vaginal sonogram where she MUST hear the heartbeat and be told the exact size of the fetus (arms, legs, and internal organs) by the physician. This is Perry's attempt to shame women into changing their minds, to make them face the reality of their decision. What Perry doesn't realize is that every woman who ever chooses to abort, already knows the reality of what she's doing, is probably sick about it, but for reasons of her own, has chosen not bring that child into the world. And it's her body. She doesn't need further shame heaped upon her. What if the woman in question is a rape victim? What if she's dirt poor and can't even take care of herself? What if there is endangerment to her own life if she carries full term? Should she then still be subjected to such emotional blackmail and shame?
and as soon as you do, you’ve got a foundation built of rock and not of sands.
One evening, minutes before closing up shop, Bradley instructed Howie to unload and stack the chicken feed delivered earlier that day. Then he invited Howie and his family to his house for supper. Howie wasn’t thrilled with his father’s order to unload that massive amount of feed. He knew he was looking at another couple more hours of work. However, he didn’t fret none, because he was looking forward to taking Summer and the boys to his parents house for some of his momma’s cookin’. Summer was pregnant again with his second child and her third. So, giving her a break in her duties would be a small relief to her.
Add next 6 ingredient and beat with hand-mixer until well combined. Pour into a greased and parchment paper-lined 8 inch (20cm) springform pan (not a cake pan as it will overflow - needs the depth of the springform pan). Bake in 350 F (175 C) for 50 minutes. Let stand for 10 minutes out of the oven before putting on a wire rack to cool slightly - but best served warm! Cuts into 8 wedges.
SINK
This precept is very difficult for me.
These dogs are smart, energetic, loving, stubborn and have the greatest desire to please people.
From thinkexist.com comes this wisdom: “Timing has a lot to do with the outcome of a rain dance” Cowboy Proverb
Funny how there are so many things we take for granted kids will know. Like the difference between a rock and a chunk of dry dirt. Cubby and I spent several minutes in the garden today inspecting chunks of dirt, crumbling them up and chucking them at the wall to see if they would break up. If they broke, that was dirt. Dirt stays in the garden. Rocks, which don't crumble up or break on the wall, can be thrown over the fence. Dirt in, rocks out.
The next most important casting choice, obvi, is Johnny “Nobody puts Baby in the corner” Castle. I know that Hollywood is going to be knocking on the doors of all of those shrimpy, testoster-phony tweeners like Zac Efron and Taylor Lautner and those beefy Australian Hemsworth brothers who look like Children of the Corn raised on L.L. Bean and steroids. But Johnny Castle is supposed to be man (I’m guessing 25-ish to Baby’s 17, although the late, great Swayze was 35 when he made the movie), so I think we can do better, and at least find someone whose pubes have come in. (And someone besides Channing Tatum, please. There have got to be other actors who can both dance and lift weights.)
I wonder about stepping on her cracks. She proceeds this thought with the allowance I will fill the gaps on my own. She allows that she is weak at times and in certain areas. She allows my own life to fill her here, to grow there to feed others in her space. She allows this growth to remain an anonymous group of caterpillars, fuzzy little apartment dwellers that she will pick up when she is good and ready. She doesn’t give them their anonymity, but she will help the chrysalis form with my guidance. She will provide the sustenance, but allow me to do the work to create the photosynthesis that will feed the fuzzies. She knows this is a circle. She knows it is complex. She’ll never need. But she will always want more.
My theory is that the ending was deliberately left ambiguous – allowing sequels….possibly…
stopped
The house is cold and quiet. I am cold and driven.
And I realized what I had just lost............
journeyman vocalist Max Carl (who’s actually pretty good, so what’s he doing here?)
So, this must not be chronologically following the last chapter, as everyone already was spread throughout the world with their own languages by the end of Chapter 10. In this chapter, humans have advanced in technology from stone and wood to bricks, and they decide that they want to leave a legacy on this earth by building a city with a large tower.
That’s why Steampunk celebrates blatant technology. It knows the complete opposite is on our doorstep.
The wall was built to satisfy a law, passed in 2006 and 2008, that authorized 700 miles of fence on the southern border, 315 miles of it in Texas. President Bush said the fence would make the border safer and was “an important step toward immigration reform.” Many of the 2012 Republican presidential candidates, with the exception of Texas Gov. Rick Perry, say they want to build a fence that spans the entire U.S. border. The Brownsville area shows just how complicated that project would be.
boil 20 mins 2.0 Warrior pellet 15.0
The Ship of Lost Men is a mediocre film with a great ending, and that’s a problem for me. First, because I try not to reveal endings (though I’ve never sworn anything to that effect); and second, because the ending of this film is both its salvation and the best summation of why it fails. So here’s what I’ll do: I’ll describe the scene without context—its architecture but not its intent—and hope that’s enough to make my point.
Life takes a turn when a young nature photographer, Justin Spencer—in pursuit of the fabled Wild Child—captures her on film. While chasing the story of a lifetime, Justin is injured and Brinn comes to his rescue. The two build a tentative friendship, but with his own violent past, an abusive alcoholic father, and a mother he couldn’t protect, he must decide if proving himself is worth betraying the trust of the girl he has vowed to help.
The first thing I found was a wreath down in my basement my friend had given me. I found a smaller berry wreath with a star that I decided to place in the middle. Using the berries I attached a few here and there to secure it to the bigger wreath.
Suzanne Collins is the author of the dystopian Hunger Games trilogy.
I recently got the chance to talk to Mike Brune about his role in ‘Blood Car’. Here, Mike talks about what it was like working with the cast and crew on-set and how he got into acting in the first place…
Teen novelist Steph Bowe (author of "Girl Saves Boy") lists seven things she would like to be able to write, including letters.
It’s been a big one for us with the birth of our first child and my PhD graduation only two weeks ago – the end of one era devoted on the most part to my own development and learning and the beginning of one centred around our family.
Creation of Virtual machines surprisingly actually works. If one can get the scheduled time to appear correctly on the pending machine (thanks for fixing the “pending vm not showing issue” BTW)
1.) I had to disable comments for this blog post since there are some rude, racist people out there.
As for the specifically tango aspects - this top was also chosen because all the eye-catching decoration is at the back, but not of a kind to cause problems with any normal embrace, while at the front there's nothing to catch on buttons or distract the eye. Most high-street chains put all the detail at the front, and the back looks disappointing, but there are exceptions, so I look out for them.
I was convinced it wasn’t long ago but after sifting through my ailing memory it came as a shock to realise the last time I had set foot in one of the places was 1981! Dearest and I took the kids to se ET.
We had a great Christmas. My 5 1/2 year old son received a sleigh load of goodies from Santa. For dinner I broke from tradition and made Steak au Poivre ....that was scrumptuous if I do say so myself! But so was dessert and I won't tempt you with those details! ; )
So. We drove to Manchester, and then the children disappeared - poof! and I got to eat sandwiches in peace and watch the vacuum company men fiddle with their equipment.
The only thing bothering me is wondering if I’ll remember to buy groceries while out or forget and be forced to make yet another trip.
stuff. Last Friday, we stopped in at an estate sale, and
O Lord,
Ethan Wingfield (REP) 4.65% 69
Having been aware of all the Kirk case since c2005 and in many ways been subjected to the same underhand vicious tactics, as have many others who have run along side this case, struggling with almost identical abuse in a mirror image of the Kirk case. Whilst it is all too easy to accuse particular sectors of the community, the truth is that we have all been bullied by localized gangs whom are nationally connected i.e. tentacles everywhere and where the Police et al have, as they are uninsured, been running a closed shop to protect their own Status Quo.
OWD: *reproving look*
If you do not know my class policies in case of a fire, tornado, or intruder in the building, please ask me today!! I want to be sure all students know what to do if you are in the classroom as well as in the break area and one of those events happen.
Unlike Karen's 400-page treatise on religion, Gil uses only twenty-six lines to express his incredulity and anger. Out of this twenty-six verses, though, nine are repeated throughout the tune. This renders his song poignant and cathartic, especially as it crescendoes towards the end. Listen to the final stanza and I dare you to remain dry-eyed: "Did you hear what they said/Yeah did you hear what they said/Did you hear what they said/About his mother and how she cried/They said she cried, 'cause her only son was dead/They said she cried, 'cause her only son was dead/Woman, could you imagine if your only son was dead/And somebody told you, he couldn't be buried/hey, hey, come on, come on, come on, come on/this can't be real."
yeah, that's why i'm voting for the OBAMA/BIDEN '08 ticket!
D0 – scope out the gate area from where your flight leaves. Make sure it is still leaving from that gate and not moved somewhere else.
Lawan Committee on Fuel
Stretch marks: No
When using the washroom facilities could you please ensure the wet paper towel you dried your hands with makes it into the garbage can. The garbage can is quite big it shouldn't be that difficult. I really don't enjoy picking up your soggy germs.
Don’t drink from that cup,
The US Secret Service said three employees will leave their jobs over the sex scandal in a hotel in Colombia which tarnished the elite presidential protection agency's image.Two leading congressmen
Thanks for the link, Father Schnippel!
Nights in Rodanthe (2002)*
41. Trolley-Things That Shine And Glow (Easter)
I had an assessment performance exam yesterday. In front of our instructor, my lab partner and I had to assess each other’s skin, gastrointestinal, and neuromuscular systems. In the real world, we wouldn’t be doing large parts of the exam, but it’s useful to learn. While we perform the exam, we talked out loud so the instructor knew that we knew what we were doing.
see, LB and i started eating healthy again. we both got stuck in MY rut of unhealthy eating. Since i am the one who does all the grocery shopping and cooking during the week – she really didn’t have much choice – and believe me, she didn’t mind.
imprisoned and his case is not related to the ‘Cuban five’. Josefina
The judge granted my motion for extra time to respond to their motion. I hope he also realizes they are lying scumbags at this point, and will be skeptical of any other "facts" they allege.
I never spoke to her again. I was notified the day after her death, by a friend, that she had passed away.
By Wednesday we should have a podcast available for download at:
“It means they can’t be beat in a fight.”
She leaves shortly after.
Of course, then it will be too late, and there will be no satisfaction in saying they got what they deserved, because we will all have paid the price.
Situations do not generally make me happy. Happiness -- such as I feel -- comes from within me. That is one of my pieces of autistic disability. Being told I've done a good job is satisfying, and that's got to be good enough I guess.
The group, led by Freddie Mercury, quickly gained a reputation as being one of the best Live Concert bands in Music History.
As he put it;
My grandfather’s name was Norman Carr. He was born in 1912 in Chinde, what is now Mozambique, and grew up in Nyasaland (now Malawi) and Northern Rhodesia (now Zambia). He is commonly known as one of the forefathers of conservation in Zambia and the founder of walking safaris. He was one of the first people to realise (and implement) - in the 1950’s - the now common practice that conservation cannot work without the local population benefiting from the wildlife in some way.
Here is Sheila's comment and my own response to it.
But according to me..life is something which can be compared to a novel…
Moyles: It begins with ‘s’ and rhymes with ‘perm’.
Here's an updated map of the world with names of the various countries / areas on it.
Grammar: direct object pronouns - the bell receives the action. Not le Meg.
Just as you can be sure that the female descendants of Queen Ingrid will wear the family veil, you can be certain that they will pair it with the Khedive of Egypt Tiara. Unlike the veil, it was not worn by either Ingrid or her mother on their respective wedding days (it was one of her mother's wedding presents); and it has only been worn by her direct descendants so far (as opposed to the veil, which was lent to in-law Mary on her wedding day).
Paper: Basic Black, Real Red, Whisper White, Polka Dot patterned paper (unknown)
1st prize: £500 plus publication
We’ve been on roads of discovery, naughty-ness, stress, change, inspiration, not to mention mind opening rants of world-changing, and epic proportions. There have been highs and lows and dramas galore, but more than anything, it has been special, simply because they have all been so present…
Click on the pic once and then click again and you can read the article.
...warm afternoons with a bucket of sidewalk chalk.
Jesus came down from heaven to die for our sins. He exchanged being the son of God so that we could be the sons and daughters of God, His blood was shed so that we could live. He is our shepherd and we are His sheep. Imagine a little sheep going astray, wandering off to where he thinks good grass is. Soon when night comes the little sheep becomes lost and then he gets tangled in some thorns and no matter how hard he struggles, he can’t get out. The shepherd looks at his sheep and counts them, he only counts 99 so he goes to look for the little sheep and when he finds it, he immediately starts pulling the thorns off of the little sheep. When he’s done he has scrapes on his hands, he picks up the sheep and puts it in the sheep pen. That is what Jesus did for us, we were little sheep and Jesus saved us from our sins. Thank You so much Jesus.
Make them your priority, nothing is more important than your relationship with your child.
Stax ~ 2011/1970
Bible Nuts and Bolts – John Chandler
Like any other parent, I want the best teachers for my children. I do not need a test score to determine the quality of my children’s teachers or school. I know the teachers my kids have had at their public school are highly effective. I look for an educator who is caring, creative, organized and communicates well with parents.
The truth will always come out sooner or later, and today it finally seems to be slipping out, as the report below details. To the bleeding heart, race traitor trolls - don’t be shy now, please entertain us with your erudite insights on this particular piece.
However only those entries using Karen`s Doodles
Jenny, a Copic-employed teacher, had this practice sheet made specifically for her. I still have 4 more little gals to color when I get more markers. She just laughed when she seen my ghoul and goblin girls and showed my page to the class. I colored these gals like I did in honor of Barb's Haunted Design House characters. I don't do spooky but can do kinda cute. The nice thing about this sheet as it gives spaces to write the Copic marker colors so you know what you used. I'm still working on the "feathering" technique but more practice will definitely help.
Bend, OR--Fifty tons of mystically contaminated grapes that were slated for incineration have disappeared from Volcano Vineyards Winery in Bend.
So I approached The First Bayonet, Steven Hildreth’s spy novella set in Egypt under Hosni Mubarak, with some trepidation. Hildreth and I have been banging heads over politics on a biweekly basis for the best part of a decade now. (And I know he reads Clancy and Flynn and Thor. I know it because I followed him onto Thor’s official Facebook fanpage and trolled it mercilessly). In addition, there’s always that risk when looking at a friend’s work that you become too critical, either out of overreaching for objectivity or simple jealousy.
Another big problem with the film is Michelle Monaghan as Patrick's girlfriend and investigative partner. She's not particularly good at either, and if she were truly an outsider in this insular Boston neighborhood, then perhaps the audience could accept her as a surrogate. But she's not - she's likewise a part of the environment, though she doesn't show it at all. And she's a weirdly mobile moral figure as well - she serves virtually no purpose as a fellow detective, eventually providing a foil for Patrick, but not much more.
One of the legendary professors at HU, Dr. Carr, leads a study abroad group each summer, usually somewhere on the Continent. This summer the students traveled, did research, took classes, and more throughout South Africa. They were even invited to dinner at the home of the President of South Africa. Major! I’m sure many of them have never even shaken hands with our very own Barack Obama. But to have tea and dinner with President Jacob Zuma and First Lady Nampumelelo Ntuli Zuma is an undeniably incredible opportunity that I’m sure none of participants will ever forget!
“My father always told me that if you keep walking, you will reach your destination. Along the way, it may rain and someone (or something) might get in your way and end up slowing you down.
Among the crimes described in the book is the 1956 hijacking of a shipment of bowling alley machinery in Danville, Ky.
~Samuel Goldwyn
"I commissioned research from specialists at Cardiff University, who surveyed more than 2,000 UK news stories from the four quality dailies (Times, Telegraph, Guardian, Independent) and the Daily Mail. They found two striking things. First, when they tried to trace the origins of their "facts", they discovered that only 12% of the stories were wholly composed of material researched by reporters. With 8% of the stories, they just couldn't be sure. The remaining 80%, they found, were wholly, mainly or partially constructed from second-hand material, provided by news agencies and by the public relations industry. Second, when they looked for evidence that these "facts" had been thoroughly checked, they found this was happening in only 12% of the stories."
* Promotion ends July 2012
This is the same as Berkeley scoring, but penalises draws. A draw is only worth:
Overall a good month. Full of ups and downs. I’m happy to end it off on the right note and back on the right track towards my goal of completing a half ironman in July!
- Shaykh Yahya Rhodus
I’m talking about this one:
I've received a few comments and emails about my camera, so I thought I'd share my favorite photography links—these folks really know how to do it right.
And how long before she falls.
A friend of mine recently pleaded with the universe for alone time and one of her friends suggested the treadmill because that is where she does her best thinking. I do not even get that reprieve as if I break my concentration too much I can not keep up the pace I am going at. I run to run, not to think about other things, usually.
1/2 tsp. ground black pepper
This layout is a few of the reasons that Sarah and I have been friends for 20-mumble-mumble years.
- The FBI’s National Center for Disaster Fraud was tasked to look into possible fraud with organizations soliciting funds for relief
Sea Hearts by Margo Lanagan - Lanagan's second novel, like her first, is a complicated retelling of a folk tale, this time the story of the selkie, the seal-woman who stays on shore with her male lover so long as he conceals her sealskin from her. Sea Hearts (The Brides of Rollrock Island in the US and UK) takes place on a small island community (which gives Lanagan plenty of opportunity for blustery, windswept, seawater-soaked description and fishing-village patois) with a history of taking "sea wives" which has now fallen into myth. When a woman is born with enough seal heritage to call the sea wives out of their skins, she revives the practice, and the island's community is rocked for generations as its men are placed under the sea wives' spell and its women find themselves displaced. As the story progresses, it switches between points of view--Misskaella, the witch who avenges herself on a community that mistreated her by exposing its men to the sea wives' enchantment (and growing rich on the money she charges them for her services), a girl whose mother is replaced by a sea wife, a recently engaged young man who comes to the island meaning to sell his parents' house only to fall under a sea wife's spell, and the children of these unions, who are the only ones who may be able to return the community to its rightful footing. The shifting perspectives help to humanize the story. Misskaella, who speaks first, is a sympathetic figure for most of her story, terrified by her power and grievously wounded by a community that mocks and discounts her for being unattractive. Her initial explorations of her power have more to do with wanting to find her own measure of love and companionship than revenge, and the brief taste of them that she gains, only to quickly lose, wounds her deeply. For the rest of the novel, even as she grows more bitter and as we gain a greater understanding of how her magic destroys her community, it's hard to forget the pain and loss that are at the root of her story.
I am mad that he hasn’t been a husband to me.
Dad probably grew up with “boomboxes” or “ghetto blasters,” big radio-cassette tape players. Today’s Dad still wants to listen to Elvis Presley or Johnny Cash or Rachmaninov (or maybe SheDaisy), but on pocket-sized iPods and MP3 players. iPods help keep distractions down while working. MP3 players make excellent companions driving or exercising. If music isn’t Dad’s thing, help keep the gray matter from getting stale with audio books.
You see, Diane doesn't go outside. She's never shown any interest in the great outdoors other than viewing it from a windowsill, and that's just fine with me. It's stressful enough having one feline roaming around the neighborhood, collecting fleas and random injuries, much less two. And she's tiny--a total runt. And we live near a very busy street. You see where I'm going with this, right? I was freakingthefuck out and thinking to myself, "I swear, if anything happens to Diane, I'll never forgive myself."
Arrange the fruit in the case. Concentric circles look nice.
12. Being in my bed. I love that.
Here we are, Thursday night, ready for a feature and I'm out of energy. Teaching all day, and Open House in the evening, have me wiped out. There's always next week, or maybe Saturday.
I think where the disconnect came in, was Mikey's relationship with Ellie, and it was hard for me to believe they would suddenly connect so strongly and not really care about the consequences. I think the major problem was I didn't quite feel the spark between them. Mikey was a charming character, and Ellie was clearly conflicted but strong– though honestly a lot less interesting than Mikey– but together they didn't quite have the magic I was hoping for, the kind that would really make me believe in what followed.
I hope you like the look of this album and, even if you can't attend the class, it gives you plenty of inspiration!
The first stop for the royal party was DeMontfort University, to attend a fashion show, meet students and staff and chose a fashion student to be the one to design the Duchess a pair of shoes. Other individuals in Leicester were given the honour of presenting the Queen and the Duke of Edinburgh gifts of their talents and creativity. One in particular was a picture of a Corgi, by a talented 10 year old girl, and I must say it was a wonderful drawing.
Lemon or lime juice and olive oil for dressing
Sorry this post is short, but like i said in my previous post everything will be back to normal once they are leaving...and by the starting of September i should be back to my regular posting rates...
Right before my sons left for a camp out this morning, my #4 bear-hugged me and called me "mama", which I love. And my #3 promised me he would not do anything stupid, like take dares or melt his shoes in the fire, or break his pelvis. Again.
“Do you think they’ll come after us?” the older of the two asked.
As global weather patterns continue to shift, we are going to see many abrupt environmental changes occurring on the planet.
Cardstock: We R Memory Keepers and Recollections
The gifts you can choose from are far too many to list, but here are a few:
Theirs is a hatred entirely misplaced. The West, and those of European, particularly Nordic and Anglo Saxon, origin has brought more benefit to humanity than any other group in the history of the world, in fact, by comparison with our contribution that of any other group is reduced to insignificance, assuming they indeed made any contribution at all.
They stared at me.
There was a complaint about the lack of mammals on this site during the recent Hummingbird Humdinger, so here is the other half of the Coati in the post before this.
Brie is working at the Farmers' Market
The moral of the story is simple: Bresson bypasses political commentary on capitalism to go straight to "money is the root of all evil." But the framing of these Raskolnikovian scenes belies any trite summary. Though Bresson's camera is so tranquil and distanced, he intimately conveys the sense of money's pervasive influence in society and, by extension, the human psyche. There's some form of tradeoff everywhere, including prison, where goods are exchanged secretly but with no real obstacles. Perhaps that's why counterfeiting is treated so seriously among the characters: counterfeiting exposes the empty, symbolic meaning of money, threatening to unmake every aspect of civilization by eroding its foundation. In prison, Bresson frames the visiting room in such a way that it's hard to say which side of the dividing glass holds the true prisoners.
I have enormous sympathy for his cleaning lady, Pat. It's a pretty thankless task; every week, the poor woman cleans out Henry's fridge and puts out on the kitchen counter everything she thinks should be discarded. Henry smiles and says that yes he'll check through her finds just to make sure. Of course, as soon as she leaves, he just wrestles the whole lot back in the fridge. I have the luxury of being his daughter, being bossy and not being prepared to accept any patriarchal prevaricating. So if it looks like a science project then its days here are done!
Let it rest. This step is critical. It makes all the juices settle back in the bird so it won't turn to chicken crackers. SERIOUSLY. Listen to me on this one. Give it 10-15 minutes of just sitting undisturbed before you carve it. You can thank me later.
Marinate the chicken with the baking soda for 15-20 mins and then rinse thoroughly. (Make sure the chicken is properly rinsed and clean of baking soda.)
Therefore, in light of these and other recent staff "cutbacks", it has become necessary to re-issue this memo on acceptable and unacceptable phrases and topics of conversation with, and in the general vicinity of Darth Vader.
No one ever suffers in obeying this command of grace for after the Apostle commended the Philippians for their fellowship in giving he wrote in Philippians 4:19, “But my God shall supply all your need according to his riches in glory by Christ Jesus.”
Unfinished Person
For the food... oh the food!! My first observation is that I love being able to enjoy an event with a friend who totally understands what I mean when I say "To really enjoy that dish, you had to have the perfect ratio of goat cheese in each bite."
The first notecard introduced for this Collection
You gave your all as we can see, to keep this old world sane and free.
6) Opeth – In Live Concert at the Royal Albert Hall
First on my list- was trying to figure out how to get all of the supplies that we needed without breaking the bank! Sun products, motion sickness items, etc.---these things can get pricey. We are on a very tight budget in the Steece household (can I getta “AMEN” from all of you hard workers out there??!)- so I needed to find cheaper items without sacrificing the quality of the items.
Well, let us be honest, Mr Dizaei may not be able to wear a uniform in public right now, he's been suspended from the force. One can but dream that this might lead to him being subsequently suspended by the neck, but alas I fear no such luck. And meanwhile, his pal Mr Ghaffur is probably too busy asking Max Clifford for hints on how best to appear for the Press.
Have you been watching The Voice? Your thoughts? Do you think about technique when you write?
I did a mixture of sized diapers for my cake. The top 3 levels are size 2 diapers and the bottom layer is size 3. My cousin was registered for Luvs brand diapers and when I opened the bags I was disappointed because they weren't just white on the outside (are any of the diapers just plain white anymore other than cloth ones? lol). Not only were they not white....they had PURPLE on them, but once I rolled one up I took a look at it and thought to myself...hmmm...the pattern kind of looks like a honeycomb which was perfect for a Pooh Bear diaper cake! So it all ended up working out great!
And thought the sleaze of R ‘n’ B best.
Zappa gave me the faith that anything in music was possible. He demystified the whole thing for musicians in my generation: "Look, these are just instruments. Find out what the range is, and start writing."""
She wasn’t right for you
Apart from being a little creamy, the avocado is rather tasteless. I made this easy and simple avocado with sweetened condensed milk dessert. Here is the recipe.
This exhausted me. I came home and put some things on the stove to cook in a daze.
I guess I can also mention that I was a winner too, I won the “Tweet Your Seat” contest and won a $20 gift certificate to Pete and Shorty’s!
Utmost deliciousness? Apparently, being adorable runs in the family.
During that time, one of the team members of FDCH (Father’s delight children Home) met Kavita in her Village and she told all her problems which she was facing. She was very poignant and disheartened about not pursuing her education. So, they talked to her grandpa and he brought her back to their home. When Kavita returned back she was very much excited about going back to school. Now, she is in her 5th standard and is very happy as she gets every thing in the home. She is an orphan and only her grandpa is there to see her but now in the home she has a family to take care.
Plot: 4
Delicious and juicy Lychee or “Litchi” reminds you the arrival of summer. Botanically, this exotic fruit belongs to the family of Sapindaceae and named scientifically as Litchi chinensis.
Then this happened:
Ever wonder what snazzy tools our care departments have to assist you when problems arise? The list is exhausting!
24) Who are you waiting for? … are you sure you aren’t waiting for me??? +
Deep
A “ban” can be established in one of two ways. The first is to establish a law declaring a certain activity to be illegal, and the second is to issue an administrative decree. Neither method, however, can violate the Constitution, or else the ban itself is illegal.
Mister Man: Cool!
After the terrorist attack on the United States in New York City on September 11, 2001, over a decade ago, the states’ populations came together in a kind of unity I had never experienced, being of a young enough age to have never been involved in any kind of foreign- much less domestic- war. The attacks on that sunny morning in September shocked an entire population into a state of awareness for each other that was intense and somehow thrilling; however, this heightened state of acknowledgement soon turned into simply an increased awareness OF each other, rather than for.
light and color never perceived
Enameled with flowers,
convoy of Governor Oshiomhole, his
The darts will be 2cm wide each.
This will be President Ahmadinejad’s first official visit to Brazil since his counterpart Dilma Rousseff took office in January 2011, replacing Luiz Inacio Lula Da Silva.
I’m going cherry-picking today, so today’s Pokemon is Cherubi.
As her boss and other police are investigating her murder, our slimy funeral owner shows up to sell his famous $144.98 funeral - well, the cost before any 'extras', of course. But the detective fills out the contract bottom line for 144.98 - and tells the funeral owner no 'extras' are necessary.
Within a few minutes, Dr. West became very enthusiastic about the idea. A date was set, Princeton students and staff began a major promotional campaign on campus, as well as at yoga studios and bookstores in the area. They also used Facebook and other social networking sites to reach a broader audience beyond the campus.
(This article was originally published by the Finland´s leading weekly magazine
Taking inventory over my life in the coming year, I plan to examine this, and make some drastic changes, that probably should have been done, along time ago. I can’t take on a project like this, without being completely honest with myself, and forth coming with others.
Chrystopher: I wouldn’t say I came across any photos that radically changed my mind about him, but I discovered two photos in particular during this project that are very revealing about him. One is the photograph of him as a teenager on page 20, and the other is the photo of him on page 172 withNan and Harry Fleischmann, probably taken by Carole Lombard. In the younger photo you can already see how big he’s going to be; he’s much taller than his friend, broader in the shoulders and wider in the hands. But, he’s at ease with his friend; he’s not attempting to dominate or overpower him. They’re just boys together. In the photo withNan and Harry, there’s nothing about his clothes or his manner that cry out “famous film star,” which he was by then. Once again, they’re just friends sitting around a cabin table together. You can see his great affinity with animals in the family snapshot on page 149 of him with Guess the boxer dog. His Harley riding outfit on page 141 highlights his sense of humour. He loved children, and you can see that in the photo on page 72 of him happily surrounded by autograph-hunting schoolboys, and then there’s the wonderful cover photo (repeated on page 95). That’s no film star; that’s any proud fisherman with his catch.
With fathers day just around the corner I thought I should start trying to find some inspiration for a gift. Luckily the girls at 'A Spoonful of Sugar" have been busy and have come up with some fabulous sewing projects.
Improve your mental state by releasing the stress that has built up within you during the day. It is a known fact that stress will create physical problems. To avoid these issues wind chimes help to control stress and release the tense feeling within you. With chimes you have the opportunity to enjoy a better state of mind while keeping your body in better shape.
Me: I didn't say anything - I was too grossed out to say anything.
The album continues with the title track (which Lynott was originally supposed to sing) and "Take a Little Time", both of which are great rockers, with catchy choruses and magnificent hooks. But the next real showstopper comes with the following track. "The Loner" is a moody and emotional instrumental, which just might be one of the greatest instrumentals of all time. The song is dripping with emotion and feels like somewhat of a precursor to Gary Moore's later blues material.
It took 26,000 miles to get here, but we are back in the USA with stops in San Diego hosted by the SD Maritime Museum then on up the west coast.
Seamus Murphy
Based on the novel by James Hardiman
The story for my (he has done this all his life you see) begins with Buddy. The cutest little puppy EVER! I wanted a puppy for a year ( I also wanted a pig) and on our second Christmas, I walked in after work and his shirt was wiggling all over. Out popped his little head and I was instantly in love. I still have him, and now he’s not so sweet. He hates EVERYONE except me and has a sever case of “grumpy old man” syndrome. But he was my first baby.
No joke, school has completely consumed my life. For example, I had a 45 minute presentation this week (ohhh noo, that is not a typo, it' really was 45 freaking minutes long), a quiz on Friday, a project due next Tuesday, a paper due next Thursday, then 2 tests on the following Monday and Tuesday.
Pangs shudders twinges pinpricks
How do you incorporate purple into your work??
I’ve hit rock bottom so hard that what’s right in front of me is blurred beyond distinction. I have no grip on the situation whatsoever. Can’t they see that? It’s not me who’s in control. It’s this inner-demon. She has all the power, and I want none of it.
Thursday to Saturday 5pm-9.30pm
We are encouraged to not weigh ourselves at home, but that takes more discipline that I possess. So I have been weighing myself most mornings on my home scale, enough to know that I’d lost some weight by the first weigh-in. Thank goodness! How depressing would THAT be, to be on a fasting diet for a week and have the scale not budge!
Also, Tom and I were kind of throwing around the idea of getting pregnant in a couple/few months. With all of this news and the treatments, that will not be happening now. I haven't yet talked with my Doc. about all the details and timeline's, but I've heard that you can't get pregnant for a year after the radioactive treatment. That was definitely a hard blow for me. I'm SO ready for a new little baby to join our family!!!
In case you are wondering: Yes the first one does nick the tune from Bob Dylan; the second one is his loose translation of a Georges Brassens number; and the third is what you might perhaps call a "mash up" of George Formby's "Chinese Laundry Blues" and this:
The man who led the class was really knowledgable and spoke great English. He's a chef at a restaurant in Paris which added to the authenticity of the experience.
Our tour started at Fort Canning Hill. At the Spice Garden of Fort Canning Park, the tour guide highlighted some of the plants and spices to us. I was rather fascinated with the turmeric though I have no photograph of it to offer here. Another plant that was highlighted to the tour group was the neem tree. I understand that it has antiseptic properties.
Our Runner-up, Amelia , receives 1 download page from THATB
From: noreply@publishamerica.com
For the first time in about three weeks I’m back in Mel mode again, my younger brothers have been back from Uni for easter so I haven’t had the house to myself in order to be me. I must say I’m already feeling the world happier dressed this way again, feels like slipping into a comfortable pair of shoes (ironic considering I’m still not used to heels Ouch).
Q. Before this job, you worked in newspapers for more than 20 years. What has that transition been like?
Marcus, the narrator, is now given extended scripts. Instead of “Day #, this is happening”, he’s made to tell jokes and imply events. An example may be “Day # and these two housemates seem to be flirting away from X’s eyes”. On top of the storytelling, the editing is all very flash now. On C4, towards the end, the editing started to take a turn for the worse with additional montages and weird effects and music, and this has now continued into the C5 version to the point where names flash up on screen and whole ‘story sequences’ are invented.
sun’s light illuminating hues of nature’s greens
of Hope”
Now, it’s time to pass on the blog love! For those newly nominated, here are the rules:
I look up from the email I am rushing to finish so that I can put out a snack for the girls and start packing for ballet. "Um, why? Did you talk about Japan in school today?"
I obviously don’t know much about the hipster culture, except that if I were the proper age, I would aspire to be one myself. But I am fascinated by foreign peoples, so we decided to imagine this outing was actually an overseas adventure to an exotic land. The tattoos were simply a melanin adaptation of local inhabitants, and the plaid porkpie hats were a costuming choice mandated by distant forefathers and their abandoned trunks of vintage clothing.
It isn't a pretty sight, is it Little One? When your heart sees, truly sees, the depravity of the human soul. It goes beyond disgusting, filthy, putrid.
How easy is that?! These were so good and a big hit at the New Years Eve party we went to. The Oreo became slightly mushy inside the brownie. Some people didn’t even realize it was an Oreo inside. I recommend using paper liners in the muffin tins. I sprayed the pan for the first batch with lots of PAM, but they still stuck.
When one discusses the existential threat posed to European nations by their large and rapidly growing Muslim populations with those not yet convinced of it, one of the most commonly-heard objections is that the notion smacks of a conspiracy theory. ‘So they’ve come here to take over, have they?’ goes the incredulous response. This line of thought, though misconceived, is superficially persuasive to some degree and not easily refutable by simply pointing out that some small minority of Muslims in each country is in fact quite vocal about its desires in this respect. As such, it deserves some discussion here.
We have all been victims of Marcoses, one time or another during their despotic rule, but I think the most aggrieved are those who have lost loves ones or who have suffered the atrocities/abuses inflicted on them and, who, until now continue to demand for justice.
This mourning, beloved, to which eternal comforting is promised, is not the same as the affliction of this world: nor do those laments which are poured out in the sorrowings of the whole human race make any one blessed.
In a little more than a week, I am starting a new job that will take me out of the house again. This post is my statement of intention to not return to being that guy. I am resolved to enter my home as if I'm an explorer, one who has every expectation of discovering all the wonder and creativity and unique joy that I missed while I was away.
Takeaway: In Ex parte Yamada, the BPAI agreed with Examiner that "hardware error" read on memory usage reaching a critical threshold because memory was a type of hardware. The Applicant presented a definition of "hardware error" as "an error caused by malfunction of a physical component of the computer," then argued an error in memory usage was a software error rather than an error in a physical component. The Board characterized this argument as irrelevant for not being within the scope of the recited claim limitations.
*are still the BEST sleeper
Scraps of paper with lots of zeros is not real aid. If they sent food or blankets that would be more meaningful. Scholarships (indoctrination) are free as many people who can be squeezed into a room with a droning lecturer or repeating film. A machine prints those dollars on paper. Paper is worth not very much. 500K of nada is what was sent to Syria.
As she struggles to separate the friend she knew from the tangle of gossip and headlines, Rain becomes determined to discover the truth about the murder. Written in a voice at once immediate, riveting, and utterly convincing, Mariah Frederick's mystery brilliantly exposes the cracks in this exclusive New York City world and the teenagers that move within it.
Week 4/16 - 4/20
45. Joe Bonamassa - Funkier Than A Mosquito's Tweeter (5:00)
Jung Yumi headlines this second installment (of the hit I Need Romance), with Lee Jin Wook and Kim Ji Suk playing each other’s rivals for her affection.
Oh hell, let's not get mired down in minor details. It's not like I'm going to offer to fly you out to California for a "good time." Seriously, who would do that?
Despite the controversy, Gainsbourg kept touring and stood up to an audience full of angry French paratroopers at a show in Strasbourg:
Redhook Ale Brewery has unveiled its latest limited release, handcrafted beer. Called 8-4-1 Expedition Ale, the American-Style Strong Brown Ale was developed by eight Redhook brewers working in four teams of two to create one beer. The ale reflects a compilation of each team’s individual recipes that were then carefully blended into one distinct beer. 8-4-1 is available for a limited time in 22 ounce bottles at select grocery stores and on draught nationwide.
W Germany
P.S. Meet my feathered kids!
iii. Layoffs maybe necessary (Let’s not kid ourselves)
"Flaws and All" by Beyonce
“But a lot of big games companies said to us that they are still interested. They see the UK as a potential European hub – that plus the UK tax break plus our mix of skills and creativity, and the UK looks pretty impressive.”
Eight storeys of Carnegie steel stacks will be ripped from the central library building's interior to make room for a new public space designed by star architect Norman Foster, whose firm designed London's city hall and the reichstag in Berlin. The library has said that the books in the stacks are showing signs of environmental wear and will be better preserved elsewhere.
Just a little note to say that there will be an intermission in my humble little blog.
Lead-free is the devil.
1 package of Feta cheese
Now if I only had the new radiator for the Bronco...... It has been two and a half weeks sent I sent the radiator in for warranty!
Let’s, once again, break it down.
A word of warning adding to these ‘enum’ like Classes is not a problem but removing an entry can break the application if the information defined by this Class is saved in a file or database. When the information is retrieved and the datum is no longer a member of the Class an error will occur. It’s best to use this Class on lists that are not expected to change much.
With all that being said and done, the other night when my blog disappeared I felt completely wronged – after I had felt like a naughty school kid who had been busted, for what I have no idea. My immediate reaction was to rectify the situation, email the support people and explain to them that I am unaware of breaking the TofA however I will remove the content if need be, ask them what I had done that had lead to the event of my blog being removed. Everything was restored pretty quickly but it had been enough time for me to think it had been taken away, creating a sickening feeling in my stomach at the thought of not only at what had been lost but also because it felt as if my right to be a human being with individual and shared thoughts had been taken off me.
“…what do you mean? So, a Jewish person couldn’t buy lightbulbs from you?”
“We are working on a new document based on the reality, but we don’t want to promise what we will not achieve. Those who have it please withdraw it, we cannot realise the money that is stated therein, but we will still come up with a document based on what we get.”
My latest project is a wall hanging made up of pictures of my ancestors who were alive during the Civil War. To fill out the hanging, I added current family pictures taken in Gettysburg plus one that was taken of me in 1952 during Portsmouth, Virginia’s Bicentennial. These pictures were scanned and then printed on inkjet printable fabric.
If you are not familiar with British TV...you should still be able to guess ''the show''... I hope...from all the little 'gadgets' on my charms :0)))
I've been living in yoga pants, sweatshirts, and (for Special Occasions outside the house) my ultra-largest jeans for the better part of a year. To say that I'm sick of it is a huge understatement. To say that I'm way too lazy to do something about it, like start exercising or stop eating Rolos by the fistful, is also a huge understatement.
Hearing “I love you,” accompanied by a hug, can end a day with love and comfort.
at Country Stitches.
who would buy them when I open a lefse-R-US.
had a panic attack and deleted facebook. i seem to just be compensating with over shopping though. also wayyyy behind on emails, so i'm very sorry to anyone i should be replying to. i think i've lost all previous life skills.
Pendant lighting
The one thing I can guarantee is that because of the early exits by the teams that have typically been dominate in the NHL, this offseason will be unpredictable and there will be major moves. It would not shock me in the slightest if the Wings went out and tried to sign Ryan Suter and Zach Parise and dumped some of their current players.
Me, I can't see Leonardo Di Caprio as Sam Spade but apparently half of the voters could. Narrowly coming in second was Robert Downey, Jr. Eddie Murphy picked up a couple of votes, but Ioan Gruffudd and Antonio Banderas were shut out.
"Will I see you again Black Pudding?"
Here are a few shots of my booth that could not have happened without the hard work and support of my husband Doug and sister Ophelia along with my good buddies Caroline and Cindy! And I was touched by my friends that attended and shopped until they dropped! My booth was nearly empty by the end of Saturday...I am truly blessed beyond words.
May 21 - Brgy. Manila de Bugabos
Level 14: MP Cost: 33, Damage: 364%, Attacks up to 6 enemies.
M-3
4 tsp baking soda
Of course politicians on the left are attempting to take all the credit for the get. It is important to give President Obama high marks for making the call to send in the SEALs. It was a risky call, and if it had gone badly, he would have taken a lot of heat, especially since the Pakistan government wasn't informed of the operation. He took a big chance, and it paid off. But it is also important that credit should also be given to the CIA and George W. Bush for their interrogation techniques in secret prisons that got the initial information that started us down the path to bin Laden.
aka Drimble Wedge and the Vegetations, Peter Cook’s band in the film “Bedazzled”. An excellent parody of the more way-out music of the period, this is still played in many psychedelic clubs to this day. Chris Morris has a way to go before his musical parodies achieve the same thing.
Source: Bought (From Borders--RIP)
and a recharged inner essence..she entered
I’d land at Dallas… call your Mum to let her know I was there… and then get on the 5:30pm or 7pm overnight flight to Gatwick. That would be the fourth night.
Instead, I have calmed and quieted myself,
…err, no.
Romantic Comedy, Rated PG, 100 Minutes
At my heaviest, I remember always feeling trapped...stuck...like I was going to be that way forever.
In a press statement today, party president Datuk Seri Dr Chua Soi Lek (picture) condemned Perkasa chief Datuk Ibrahim Ali’s statement urging the government not to fulfil its pledges of development to the Chinese community.
I still have passion also. I get excited over all kinds of things. I still love learning and reading, and still have that same zest for life I had when I was younger. Most of us still have these things. I will admit I no longer have those good looks, or that body, but what the heck, my mind is better than ever.
Posted by Justin "The Claw" at 1:25 PM 1 comments
Today started out with trying to determine the date of death of the brother of my great-grandmother, George Laymon. I hadn't really looked very hard before, so I thought I would try FindAGrave.com as a long shot. Lo and behold! There was a memorial for him and it included a photograph of his and his wife's tombstone.
Dear Query Shark
Pendragon: I have files on everyone.
My first attempts were made with active dry yeasts that I teased into bubbly liquids with honey and other sweet things mixed into milk. I eventually figured out which supermarket close to me would sell me fresh yeast, which worked much better. I also switched to water for everyday bread.
In June, Governor Corbett signed a budget that reduced funding for PASSHE by 18 percent.
1/8 teaspoon nutmeg
Claire Rutledge still believes in love, despite losing her husband. So, after two years, she’s not surprised by the steamy dreams telling her it might be time to start moving on. But she didn’t expect her friend Justin to have the starring role.
Branagh may have had lofty ambitions about bringing this extraordinary story to life on the screen, but he created a monster.
The entire set was constructed out of wood, paint and polystyrene board (typically used for insulation). We used some really cool techniques to sculpt and paint the faux brick.
Yet claims to now want to reveal the true Elvis, set the record straight or make right all the negative rumours.
And, I'll use my nice camera instead of BB to capture the transformation.
I've paired her up with some papers from a 6x6 pad from Authentique. The ribbon was from my stash as was the rosette and sentiment. I cut her out and placed her on top the DP cut out with the spellbinders scalloped circle. Of course she was colored up with copics. The pinks were done with E89, 85, 83, 81, RV000. Her hair was done with C9, 7, 5,3, 1 and her bags and feather was done with some spica glitter pens.
When I plant tomatoes, I dig a good sized hole. A small handful of crushed egg shells goes into the bottom of the whole, along with a small amount of a balanced fertilizer. The tomato stem is then stripped of the bottom leaves and it is planted with as much of the stem buried as possible. The tomato stem will send out roots and give the plant a strong and deep root system. That deep root system will give your tomatoes a better chance of retrieving nutrients and moisture from deep in the soil. They will be more resistant to problems due to lack of water.
Heat up wok and put in the vegetable oil. Sautéed garlic until fragrant and add in the kueh teow. Fry for a short while then add in the soya sauce, dark soya sauce, vegetarian oyster sauce, salt, chili and pepper. Fry thoroughly then add in the eggs and fu chuk. Lastly, put in the bean sprout and stir until it is cook a little so that it will remain crunchy.
I have to confess to being a bit leery of the movie, after hearing several "meh" reviews of it. I'm quite a fan of the books, and the societal/class commentary contained within them. If, somehow, despite constant media bombardment, you're still unfamiliar with the books, the basis is (and here I click over and steal from Wikipedia):
I did some research to know Balisacan’s stand or views on certain economic issues, such as redistribution of wealth, population control, poverty reduction, and welfare programs. That is, my purpose is to know whether he’s a Keynesian, Marxist/statist, or a free market economist.
So far i have not completed any of the tasks but am trying. These are all really lofty goals for me. The work out thing is probably the easiest but, i have to feel well to do it. (Not that i'm whining about being ill, mind you.)
I knew he was already surfing and CW doesn’t really have a password set up on her system, so I said “Don’t need one, Slug-butt.” Yes, Slug-butt is our special name that only I can call him. He loves it. Slugs are funny. Butts are funny. It’s a perfect name.
Bibliographic details. Paperback, 338 pages. ISBN 13: 9780195394870; ISBN 10: 0195394879. Price: $19.95. Web page here.
Date published - October 15th 2011
The lunatic synthetic noise collage continued. An active participant in the console fitness wars he most definitely wasn’t, so Ophelia inched the door a gentle smidgen further.
Weston and members of his party have their hearts in the right place. But they're trying to square the circle. They want to accommodate themselves to a system that is essentially tyrannical while pretending to be part of a mainstream that is about anything but freedom. As they say over there, "Best of British luck to you."
Or for that matter, all the hate speech/rhetoric that is coming from the likes of Ridhuan Tee, or those amorphous character (s) that spew poison under the pen name of Awang Selamat? Isn’t that incitement?
Today Ben came back from mailing some Christmas packages with ...packages...for me! He said the one was kinda old because he had forgotten to give me the sign for it slip. I gave him a look and said...see..this is why I don't like you picking the mail up and going to work with it!
I couldn't end things without naming some others I really like: Brazil, The Matrix, The Terminator (1 and 2), Children of Men. I didn't bother with cartoons, or I might have added Final Fantasy: The Spirits Within, and I also left off zombie films and such, as they don't seem like sci-fi to me.
Anyway, back at the Fortress, where we find out that Superman has his own symbol mounted on a brick wall above a fireplace (?), Superman goes into an intense whine-spree, going on for a while about how his childhood was totally awesome, but he still feels bad about his birth parents dying and he's so alone even though everyone in the world loves and respects him. That attitude right there? That would be why Lex Luthor wants you dead so badly, Clark.
